PBS is BN’s largest Sabah-based party, and has been a leading voice, along with United Pasokmomogun Kadazandusun Murut Organisation (Upko) president Tan Sri Bernard Dompok, in calling for the RCI to be held before polls.
For the purposes of this battle, the definition of an "overlooked book" is a book that never got the recognition it deserves. These are books we love, but no one has ever seem to hear of. So now they'll get their chance to shine!
49. Status updates for a pet’s Facebook account
I chided myself for being so slow. Many Kurdish friends also do not wear seat belts- we laughed as we recently taught a 14 year old who had NEVER used a seat belt not to wrap the seatbelt around his neck; how to wear it safety/correctly. Much to my sorrow, Kurdish people have been, and continue to be, subjected to terrible disadvantages, and worse. Why add to the number of deaths and disabled Kurds by not wearing seat belts. We are all precious; let’s all “belt up”!
Oregon U.S. Attorney Dwight Holton praised the verdict Thursday night.
"Whenever I see kids in school uniforms I think of totalitarian societies and their unfree subjects. I think of prisoners in their jumpsuits. I sometimes think of the UPS guy and the clerks at Home Depot. I never think of freedom. Not ever." -PS Pirro, in her book 101 Reasons Why I'm an Unschooler.
A while back, Lana and I decided to challenge each other to alter the same items that we purchased together at the Goodwill Store. Well, we are at it again! Here is the item we have chosen to alter this time around . . .
Since I have been cooking 5 dinner in ONE hour, I have seen a big drop in the food bill at our house. My grocery bill (for the dinners) is on average $50-$60 per week which works out to about $10-$12 per dinner and no grease! Saving money is great but feeding my family a healthy dinner every weeknight is priceless!
Xiao G, Pan C, Cai Y, Lin H, Fu Z. Effect of benzene, toluene, xylene on the semen quality and the function of accessory gonad of exposed workers. Ind Health 2001; 39: 206-210.
I tried and tried to think what these notes might mean. Considering where they were in the pad, I had written them quite a while ago. And I could not, for the life of me, figure out why I would have written such obscure musings.
And the little mother hen in me said, "Isn't that cute?"
the very earth trembled as the sun came up
‘There are some species that will forage on emperor penguins but it’s not likely that it has happened to Happy Feet because of the area he was in,’ he told New Zealand’s ONE News.
2) Write and submit one or more short stories for the first time. - I have written one new story (about 1000 words) but will not be submitting it right now. It's for a private forum competition and I'll be waiting to see what feedback I get from that before sending it out for a regular submission.
As time spun, they’d frantically search for each other on their Cyber-Planet where their shared music inspired them at their deepest soul level.
Kelley says...........
And did I mention that Beyonce and Jay-Z have a white butler they call White Butler (Samberg)? The ending was really weird, and it’s kind of odd timing to make fun of the musical guest from two weeks ago (Timberlake apologizes via sign at the end), but it doesn’t matter. This is one of those “let’s see everyone’s impressions” sketches that really works.
Nicest. Email. Ever.
-once beets are out of the oven, layer vegetables in a mason jar and pour liquid over vegetables
‘Therefore I have decided to personally refund Mr Meekins’ airfare, and Spirit Airlines will make a $5,000 contribution, in his name, to the charity of his choice, Wounded Warriors.’…..
EXTRACT
Jupiter was having yet another party in Olympus. Banquets were laid out for all the gods so that they could eat till their hearts content. Recliners were put out, covered in the softest velvet. A son had been born to him finally. His name was to be Perseus. He would be a healthy boy with the world at his feet. Slowly the boy grew up. Gods grow at a rate of 3 human years per minute until they are 16, when they stop growing. As Perseus grew he began to resemble his father. The gods watched in awe. This little one was so much like their king yet no one knew what his future would hold.
In a second game I played a one-on-one against on of the new HotT players and did a little better, using the Conan army against Jason. But then, how can you go wrong with Conan. :)
Divide the custard into 3 bowls, while still hot. Add the chocolate to one, raspberries to the next and blackberries to the last. Cover the surface with baking paper so a skin doesn’t form, place the bowls in the fridge.
OU: This is most likely an upgrade (less hiss), includes "All I Wanted" and almost 10 more minutes in the form of the final encore.
Please go to their blog address, for example:
Identifying a Fraudulent Claim
We're 34 weeks and some change, coming up quickly on 35 weeks and I'm round and full of babies! The end is just a couple short weeks away, and I've started to feel that melancholy bittersweet sense of wanting to grasp every single last little moment of enjoying having the babies in me, and also just want to be able to mow my damn lawn!
embarrassment
What inspires you?
Now that I think about it...a crocheted ripple throw in blue and white ~ in an ikat pattern ~ would be so bluetiful!
A sibling loves and hates you and often calls you the strangest things based on your shared history. Parental pet names tend to be sweet and innocent, while spouses and lovers use more poetic or even suggestive terms of endearment. Tiny people often can't pronounce our names, especially if they are chock full of Ls and Rs. Bullies target qualities they don't like, or try to concoct cruel rhymes (in my case, these tended to make the bully sound stupid instead of cruel). Our friends give us nicknames that create our identities in our peer group and give us a sense of belonging--often tied to shared history or shared associations. For instance, we called my college friend Dave "Darth," because his last name was Vater. He relished it, though his expertise was Chewbacca impressions. But you get the idea.
“I remember noticing a knife in the hands of one of the men on the ship as he moved on an Israeli soldier. This was in the earliest set of images taken from Turkish TV. Within a few hours that part of the image had been cropped out. I also was puzzled by the weapons in the hands of the Israelis because I could not identify them. It later was released that they were carrying paint-ball guns.”
McDermott had appointed notoriously flaky winger Jobi McAnuff as captain, we went about half a million games without scoring a first-half goal at home, and the defence looked like they’d just met (which at least in some cases was fairly accurate – I’m looking at you, ‘Premier League’ loanee Bongani Khumalo).
Both BP and WRRC are funding the project, said Pete Stahl, director of the WRRC, which is in the College of Agriculture and Natural Resources.
Ricotta Cheese
I want to thank WordPress.com for not only being watchful of scams but also being efficient and quick when there’s an issue with their blogs.
Off of the rocky coast of the Maritimes
My first book, Life, Love, and a Polar Bear Tattoo, went up as a free download in December 2008 everywhere but Amazon (because I couldn't figure out how to make it free there) and has been free ever since. I listed my second book at Amazon for 99 cents in May 2010 and sold a grand total of 3 books that month. I continued on anyhow, releasing two more 99-cent books in 2010 and two more in early 2011. My sales were better than three a month, but not by much!
1 Samuel 16:7 But the LORD said to Samuel, "Do not look at his appearance or at the height of his stature, because I have rejected him; for God sees not as man sees, for man looks at the outward appearance, but the LORD looks at the heart."
Hello everyone! Our challenge this month is Birthdays! You can never have enough birthday cards on hand right? They always seem to sneak up on me - so I like to have a stash of cards on hand. Our blog is mostly about card making - but feel free to enter any craft project you have made - as long as it incorporates stamping (digital or rubber) and follows this months Birthday theme.
I sit in classes and I want to participate, but half of the conversation is anecdotal or flounderings by people who haven’t done the reading but still want their speaking points. Questions are asked and either abandoned before they are answered or brought up again and again if the people who asked them first are quiet. People think out loud in ways that are not helpful to the class discussion. Students stop participating as some classes progress because the class dynamic is intimidating or overwhelming and never once have I seen a facilitator try to fix that.
Indeed, Freddie comments on his own lack of definition and the lack of clarity of motive. He has always, he says, had a sense of myself as something without weight, without moorings, a floating phantom. He was always different from others who
963. Cinnamon Crunch Bar @ Mom & Dad’s House (Pottstown, PA) 11:12 a.m.
Let me know if you participate!
i got use to driving 30 mins to the grocery store, now only 2 mins away - having less people around - but being down south - not on the water - people buy these homes so cheap and it's the only explanation i can have for why they would buy them - b/c there literally is NO work down south - so they all have to commute to NYC or Philly to work - but they think they are big and mighty b/c they bought a new construction house - well jokes on you people - you are to blame for the wildlife dying and having no where to live - you are to blame for cutting down tons of trees and not letting our earth produce the oxygen it use to - SHAME ON YOU!
轻灵的笑声
So here they are in no particular order:
Unfortunately, ten young men put paid to my perambulations after dark when they stormed our house and broke my family. February 21, 2010 was the day I learned to be frightened of my own shadow. I was unable to go out after dark by myself; would jump at loud noises, especially men shouting; and felt completely vulnerable even in the supermarket car park.
Dear Gabe,
Brads
Founded in 1979, WWN was the only supermarket tabloid that adhered to the weird and wonderful when all its cousins shifted their primary focus toward vomiting up dullwitted celebrity gossip. Now where will we go to learn of the latest exploits of Bat Boy? Who will tell us when the aliens endorse Hillary Clinton?
Early reviews of Joss Whedon’s The Avengers are, for lack of a better word, ecstatic. Already the film is in IMDb’s Top 250 and has a 97% on Rotten Tomatoes. Can this superhero juggernaut really be this great? We do not know as of yet. The film has premiered in Europe and fanboys are flocking to the theatre yet American fans are forced to anxiously await for May 4th to roll around. Few people have actually seen the movie and therefore we must rely on promotional material and hardcore fan opinions to make any sort of judgement.
When I introduce executive benefit plans, it is not unusual for the employer to host a dinner including the spouses of key employees. Companies with a culture of ‘family’ may find it beneficial to include the key employees’ family. Another important suggestion made by the SHRM is to make the communications plan a year-round endeavor, not just a one-time event.
The return email address seemed like my bank’s. I looked closely at the logo in the email, and it was identical to my bank’s.
This journey toward Zen isn’t about the Math. It is about the point that the Math doesn’t even matter. Even though Calculus eventually explained the paradox in terms of a Convergent Infinite Series, Zeno’s Paradoxes are a reminder that life itself is the Convergent Infinite Series. It is filled with approximations and the lessons of common sense because nothing can be quantified exactly. It is the sum of infinite moments frozen in time. More importantly, it tells us that despite the infinite number of these experiences, we always get to the end of the trip. Always.
On Monday, rain will fall north and center occasionally accompanied by a few thunderstorms and hail. South local rain. Still fear flooding rivers in the wadi. Hermon snow.
* Mother, the ribbons of your love are woven around my heart.
In coaching a frutiful area of work centres on the saboteur or gremlin voices that we all are affected by in one way or another. These internal voices - seemingly having their own character - are internalised aspects of others, or developed self-talk based on some childhood or later adult learning that end up becoming an unconsious 'rule for life'.
“Fuck,” Shadow Stalker said.
Released: 2009
Once I'd realized what he meant by selling chicken, aka for a large poultry supplier, I broke out into a song. I'm serious. Yes, I'm this nerdy. I don't remember the whole thing unfortunately (or maybe fortunately), but part of it went something like this (to the tune of O' Christmas Tree):
gets in to you,
I am so excited to announce that I will be in two upcoming craft shows in October. The first will be Mom's Time Out Fall Event which is Sunday, October 2nd from noon to 4pm @ Earth Fare. I am so excited to be a part of this event. I've been to several Mom's Time out events as a customer in the past and it has always been wonderful.
05 Shutout (Foster) 5:51
You feel you’ve primed the pump properly to indulge in what you’ve really come here to do: play your own songs. You’ve been wood-shedding with these guys twice a week for months to earn the opportunity to play your own songs. You’ve learned 3 sets of cover songs so you could then negotiate slipping in as many original songs as non-writing members would relent to learning. You’ve done your best to convince not just yourself that you are a sensitive, undiscovered treasure.
Faster than a speeding bullet, more powerful than a locomotive, and able to leap tall buildings in a single bound – It’s a bird! It’s a plane! It’s Superdad!
Shortly after noon they had reached a height of around 2000 feet above the river and, exhausted, thirsty and soaking wet from the high humidity, found themselves at a tiny grass-covered hut. The two farmers who lived in the hut, Melquiades Richarte and Anacleto Alvarez, welcomed their grateful visitors with a meal of sweet potatoes and gourds filled with refreshing water. The farmers explained that there were numerous terraces in the vicinity upon which they could grow their crops and that they were also nicely hidden away from any undesirable visitors on the look-out for taxes or volunteers for the army.
The two reporters go to Mothra Island anyway with Professor Miura. They are captured by the local villagers and are brought to the tribe’s chief. The three ask for assistance but, as expected, are turned down because of the atomic testing that destroyed their island, and Japan's failure to return the egg.
1c sour cream
whew you made it through....maybe i should post more often to keep the randomness at bay....just a thought??....
In other (and better) news, my boyfriends dad bought me this mini neon stachel from Old Navy last week! Can I just say that I LOVE it? It's just big enough to fit my wallet, cellphone and a napkin. I really needed to learn to bring less stuff with me when I go somewhere because my shoulder always hurts so bad at the end of the day!
Versafine - Onyx Black
whither shall I cause my shame to go?
The officials named in the case include the most senior legal minds in the Bush administration. They are: Alberto Gonzales, a former White House counsel and attorney general; David Addington, former vice-president Dick Cheney's chief of staff; Douglas Feith, who was under-secretary of defence; William Haynes, formerly the Pentagon's general counsel; and John Yoo and Jay Bybee, who were both senior justice department legal advisers.
Hen’s eyes grew wide as ­­­pancakes at this suggestion.
So, we have created a world which is completely dependent on the efforts of human beings to maintain and sustain itself. This clearly contradicts the heart of the Sabbath practices which reorient our lives around the fact that we are not owners in an absolute sense and the maintenance and sustenance of life on this planet does not depend on us. What are the repercussions for a world in which we have transgressed this Sabbath boundary and made a world dependent on us, in essence making ourselves God? I suggest that this question, “What shall we eat?” reveals once again our addiction to control and domination and our complete disconnection from the land. The Jubilee is a radical act of faith in the ability of the creation to sustain itself and ourselves, if we are willing to understand the boundaries of the system as it was created.
Parking was easy at the site – no fee – and number pickup was organized. There were two one person bathrooms and given the remote location and number of runners, that was not by any definition enough. A few in the parking lot would have been a very good idea.
How do you know what to price them?
It's already Tuesday again, with the Bank Holiday this weekend here in England I have been totally getting my days mixed up, I thought Monday was Sunday, so now today is Monday, but it's really Tuesday!!!!
Anwaar: You speak as though my sister did a hideous crime.
We’re very nearly to the weekend.
4. Lets talk Bff’s….Mallory is hands down a terrific friend to Merit, the girls relationship is real, down to earth and fun….not to mention hysterical. What is your favorite memory or favorite thing to do with your bff? Feel free to share pics!
In a oven safe skillet (like a caste iron pan) heat your butter and oil. Add garlic and allow to fry for 30-45 seconds. Then add chopped onions, celery, carrots, salt and dried thyme.
Perhaps the most powerful element of the filmmaking alchemy is editing. Margaret's editing has been much commented on, but most commentators fixate on the fact that it took half a decade for the current cut to be arrived at by Lonergan and his editors (Anne McCabe is credited as editor, but apparently Dylan Tichenor, Thelma Schoonmaker and even Martin Scorsese had their hands in cutting at various points in the process.) Many of the film's reviews take for granted that Margaret's editing was never satisfactorily completed. Even certain positive notices start from this assumption, and make claims for the film's successful aspects as achieved in spite of flawed editing choices. If this seemed a justifiable reading after a single viewing of the film, a second made it seem ludicrous unless coming from the perspective of a supporter of the continued homogenizing of American narrative filmmaking.
complete with festivals similar
-Pull up banners have a long life, so you should not worry, for you can take pleasure in the advantages of it for actually some time to come.
Jesus wasn’t willing to play that joke on the paralyzed man thinking he had gotten his deepest wish, only to find out after two, three, maybe four months of euphoric state that again he was only- empty.
Coherence keeps me happy. Coherence stops me from screaming like a bag lady at a passing subway train. Beyond that, what keeps me in the theater is having a single, unbroken shot skipping from Black Widow fucking up some dudes, to Captain America fucking up some dudes, to Hawkeye impaling some dudes (thereby fucking them up), to Iron Man flying around and fucking up some flying dudes, to Thor using electricity to fuck up some electrified dudes, to the Hulk fucking up everybody. I was leaping about in my seat like a two year old that had just spotted that last Tickle-Me Elmo and I was going to HAVE IT, no matter who I had to kill. This is synergy of such epic proportions that even God must have crossed his legs once or twice. And that dude is old. He has to use some kind of deity-strength Viagra these days. Why do you think we haven’t had any divinely impregnated virgins recently? Performance issues.
There was no more frightening place in cursed Nazerak than the dark and shadowy places. A nightmare world existed beyond the reach of the old sun’s faded rays, and fearsome creatures inhabited that domain, intent on destroying the sun-loving denizens of Nazerak. By day, Sharia’s people were compelled to make war amongst themselves, but at night, they fought terrors greater and more profound. Coming from the darkness, they feared deep in their bones a return to that benighted place.
“For you maybe, are you so eager to be a grandmother? You don’t even look like one.” I try that angle to get her to back down. “Besides, I don’t even remotely like any of them half as much as I would need to… to…”
A can of this Oskar Blues beer should work out well to round out the night. Very clear straw with a decent head. Looks pretty fizzy though. Has a basic "beer" smell, just a little stronger. In other words, kinda funky bitter, kinda sweet, kinda veggie: basically what the swill drinkers would call "beer smell". On the flavor, I get a stronger than expected malt, with some toastiness, followed by a nice dose of bitter hops, maybe German Noble hops. (Damn, Lynette's pregnant... watching Desperate Housewives finale on DVR). Carbo is not too strong, but there is some level of ickiness bitterness in the aftertaste. Basically take your basic pilsner and dial everything a few notches. But not quite in a good way like an Imperial Pilsner. I do like that toastiness in there, it's almost a little nutty. And the body is not too thin. (Come on Susan get the hell outta there! That Tin Man is a bad MFer). I'll give this beer a solid 3 Star as the aftertaste eases up the more you drink it. Even in my tall pilsner glass. I can't see myself getting another sixer of this one but it does remind me of this little number. Dammit Latifah, did you have to get that reduction? We loved you the way you were.
Science, Technology, and Globalization Project, Harvard Kennedy School
From the moment we set foot in the temple space, we found ourselves wandering wide-eyed, excited to take it all in. There were the gorgeous temple exteriors, with its ornate guardian statues...
I am in an abusive relationship. Night after night I indulge in copious amounts of love, and morning after morning both loves walk out on me. I searched. For years I sought for what could fill the void I experience each morning. What could take the place of the meal I ate the night before. What could alter the headache I had upon waking up, knowing alcohol will be too embarrassed to be seen with me until night has come.
Day 3 was spent at the Batterson house hanging out with Owen's aunt, uncle, cousins & grandparents! He had a lot of fun playing with the presents they got him, reading books with them and crawling around all over the place!
All in all, we had an awesome time. Beyond all my raving above, I also loved that even A-list chefs were actually in their booths, some actually cooking. In my opinion this is the best collection of amazing restaurants / chefs etc from a wide-ranging spectrum that you will find in LA for just $50 (General Admission is $60, but early birds got $10 with publicized promotion code) - setting a high bar thanks to the eponymous Mr. Gold's currency in the culinary arena. And is the antithesis of the awful, fool-me-once-shame-on-you-fool-me-twice-shame-on-me event thrown by Los Angeles Times ($65 at door). For one thing, I actually left stuffed to the gills, and at no time did I feel like I was going to expire from dehydration out on the streets due to 'exposure' to extreme heat in an uncovered venue in the dead of SoCal summer, with little obvious access to water or other beverages besides alcohol. And I didn't have to pay for any food that's even the tiniest bit larger than one bite-full, after paying exorbitant admission - Gold Standard was AYCE, once you're in the venue, it was a free for all. Gold Standard is definitely, especially very much appreciated by foodies on a budget - if you only go to one food event next year - make it this one! (And as I mentioned, with admission to the event you also get to wander through the awesome auto museum, which includes of all things the Batmobile - the regular cost of admission just to the museum is $10 for adults, so I consider it an additional value!)
“Be of good courage, and He shall strengthen your heart, all you who hope in the Lord” (Psalm 31:24 in the New King James Version of the Bible).
you are squashed
1). Unlike the matter concerning the Secret Service, this incident didn’t involve matters of possible “national safety or security.” It surely brought no threat to the Commissioner’s safety!
This recipe is way simple. Make the topping and reserve a cup for the topping. Mix basic ingredients together and bake. I subbed mini semisweet chocolate chips instead of regular size ones. I find them more delicate in a cake and you can use a little less of them.
It’s off to the bike shop now. I was feeling confident when I bought a new bike a few months ago and bought some shoes and pedals with lock in cleat things. I’m soooo uncoordinated though that I can’t stop and get my feet out without stacking it. This means I haven’t ventured out of my back yard (grass!) since I bought it. Going in today to have ‘normal’ pedals put back on. Maybe after the October event I’ll be brave and ask for the special ones to be put on again.
I am grateful that all but one are in the hole at 20 metres!
a slow and steady anxiety
It’s funny how songs become favorites. They usually start off as simple tracks that perhaps have a catchy tune or a beat that piques my interest. August and Everything After was one of my standard albums in my early days of high school. They were a local band and not well-known at the time. They opened up for some bad grunge band I saw at an amusement park, and I was smitten. Adam Duritz’s voice is lovely. At least I think so. I have had a crush on the poor guy for almost 20 years.
This year marks the 14th full year since the signing of the landmark MSA. Cigarette sales nationally are down more than 30% since the agreement went into effect and the public health provisions of the MSA that restrict cigarette advertising and promotion in numerous ways have changed the way cigarettes are marketed in the United States. This decline will have significant long-term effects on the health of Kentucky citizens and in health care costs related to smoking in the future.
The other locations being looked at include plots at Keynsham, Stanton Wick, Radstock and Whitchurch, while a site proposed at Camerton was dropped from the list.
The next step is to find a sponsor. I need to find someone who will sign paperwork to lay claim to me and my skills. Without a sponsor I can not apply with the state to practice what I can do. As I no doubtably have said before, I want to work for a specific ambulance company. (The fire department would be my dream employer, but I can make some compromises). The ambulance company I want to work for has the municipal contract and that means that if the call is BLS (basic life support -meaning the ambulance needs only EMT-B level providers), often times the fire department will have them do the transport of patients. If the call is ALS (advanced life support -for more threatening cases meaning at least one paramedic, aka EMT-P will be providers), but in that case, only if the City Fire Department doesn't feel they have the resources or time to do it, or so it seems.
I find it hard to judge just how good/bad my French is when as soon as I open my mouth people realise I am not a francophone and they immediately speak to me in English. However in the job market it is a necessity that you have a good knowledge of French and I do know I couldn't hold down a job in French.
Dear CNIE Member,
Wow another fantastic fortnight has flown by and you guys rock! So many wonderful creations to look at.
But still nothing happened.
I wasn't thinking of that as I turned from the locker to face the room again.......
I mean fucking seriously. That is asspull after asspull after asspull all following on from completely fucking nonsensical deus ex fucking machina! Gai could have just stabbed Shu at ANY FUCKING POINT IN THAT. HE HAD THE SWORD LIFTED READY TO BRING DOWN ON HIM. WHY. WHY DIDN’T HE KILL SHU.
His wife from Pola de Siero.
If you need information, most of our leaflets have been distributed already but if you haven’t received one you will soon be able to download them from this blog.
Some people call this Gotcha Day or Forever Family Day. I think it will be the latter for us, as even though it has only been 24 hours so far, it already feels like Forever. She fits in so well and we all love her to pieces.
When I was starting out in this business as a copywriter, I earned crap (and yes, less than my male counterparts) and worked my ass off. I almost did not have enough to buy food, just pay my rent and my utilities, so when it came to a luxury of owning a mobile phone, it was very hard indeed. I ended up buying a pay as you go mobile phone because that was all that I could afford. The funny thing is, where I worked, they had a telecommunications client. But years went by and no one at my agency offered to even make me a deal on a new phone, so one day I walked in with my new and "other company" phone.
Would you wait an entire month before calling police to report the child missing? Not very likely now, is it? However, that is exactly what happened when Caylee Marie Anthony went missing on June 16 / 2008. Caylee’s (then) 22-year-old mother, Casey Marie Anthony waited until she was pressured to report the toddler missing on July 15 / 2008. A month after her baby girl was last seen. Seems impossible, doesn’t it?
For this week's BWT, I decided to dedicate it to my favorite fashion designer, Betsey Johnson, whose licensing company recently filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy, meaning that the majority of her stores will close down. Read More Here
SECOND COURSE Vanilla Glazed Lockhart Quail, Tangerine Jicama Slaw 'Ojos de Oro' Z Reposado, Cuarenta y Tres, Fresh Lemon, Topo Chico
Surely I will stumble, surely I will drown
I email.
I was finally able to update the shop this morning before heading out to work. For those interested, I have a 9 to 5 working as a counselor at a local college which shall remain nameless. I'm on the phone a lot, so that's when I do most of my stamp designing.
He suggested we meet in Opelousas – the halfway point between our
Easy Tips to Avoid Obesity, by Dr. Mercola…This article I read not so much for the title, but the content. It gives us a reminder of some ways to avoid falling into the modern diet trap. Focus on actually eating good food, not larger portions of “diet” food. Good fats, not modern version of “healthy fats.” And much more information which is a good refresher or maybe some new information.
Makes about 18 muffins.
1 out of 5 - Language – The highest level of colorful language is “craptastic”, followed closely behind by “crud” and “sheesh”, plus chic slang like “CCP” (Cute, Cool, & Popular, if you didn’t already know this, which you should have), “OMG”, and “BFF.”
Last night - On the Summer Solstice, I took a walk with 2 of my Besties.
When The Asylum brings you on for a film, what’s your process?
Bali – a beautiful island blessed by the Gods!
That said, despite Sen. Shapiro's comments, to my knowledge, TDCJ can't actually provide recidivism rates for participants in Windham programs. A January 2011 report (large pdf, p. 15) on Windham from the Legislative Budget Board stated that the agency is currently "developing a plan to compute recidivism rates of participants in and graduates of the agency’s programs, as well as exploring strategies to compare these recidivism rates with those of the general TDCJ population and to assess the savings produced by any reduction in the recidivism rates related to these programs." So if they're "developing a plan to compute" those rates, that tells me recidivism rates are not being computed right now.
I’m trapped in a white room,
On the surface, Lynsey Reznor seems to have it all. She is beautiful, brilliant, and a successful true-crime writer who has been living the past decade in Miami. But what Lynsey lacks is what she needs the most—a family.
The largest planet in our solar system is usually dominated by two dark bands in its atmosphere, with one in the northern hemisphere and one in the southern hemisphere.
One should never underestimate just how grateful South Koreans are about being helped in that war. To this day, most Koreans would first associate Turkey with "blood ally" [혈맹]. It also helps that, since the end of the war, Turkey and Korea have maintained a healthy distance that is so crucial to a good friendship. (This is in contrast to the United States, which undoubtedly did a lot of things to annoy Koreans partially because it has been a little too close, eating away at the good will it earned by having been the greatest help in Korean War.) The fact that Korean pop culture ended up being popular in Turkey later is just gravy.
I’ve always got a list of running shoes a mile long that I’m lusting after. I know I should just find something that I like and then stick with it, but there are always new and exciting models coming out! Plus, of course, new colours…
But after the service it was a case of taking a few photographs and then heading home to get cracking on other wedding projects and then a little play with some more of my goodies from the NEC yesterday.
Going through a divorce, William wasn’t happy. His wife was getting everything, the house, the car and the kids. William couldn’t have cared less about her getting the kids, but he was sure going to miss that car. While on duty one evening, William came up with what he thought was a brilliant idea. He decided he was done with letting Jessica run over him. She may be getting the car but William was going to make sure it wasn’t worth getting. From the brain of darkness, he had a bright idea. He bought a bottle of Drano, and filled a Styrofoam cup with the chemical to throw on his, soon to be, ex-wife’s vehicle. He knew it would take the paint off the car because he had just arrested someone for doing the exact same thing. He got to his cruiser and placed the cup on the hood in order to tie his shoe. What William was too dumb to realize was, if Drano can take the paint off a car, what could it do to a Styrofoam cup? It was already dripping through the bottom of the cup and had run down the front of his cruiser. He tied his shoe and pick up the cup and got in the police car, started it up, and headed down the road. He felt a burning sensation in his hand, and that is when the bottom of the cup gave out completely. The chemical went everywhere. His uniform was destroyed. The upholstery in the vehicle was destroyed. The cruiser had to have a new paint job, and he got third-degree burns on his hand. Before you think about what you want to do to someone else you should remember that God works in mysterious ways, especially off the Creek.
We came home rested, happy and ready to take on the world again.
Just live your own life. Make your own choices for you.
Sam, Cafe Proprietor: What'll you have?
The vampire took his eyes off of the list momentarily and stared back at her. “Oh, please,” he exclaimed, motioning toward her chest. “You think you are cold now!” Barbara immediately crossed her arms at her chest once again. “So easy,” Nathaniel smiled, glancing back to the list one last time. “I do have one question for you, however. I have seen goats in my time.” He glanced her way, mischievously. “I’ve seen panties. Just what the hell is a blogger?”
The married one then said: “The other night I sent the kids to stay at my mothers for the night, I got myself ready, leather bodice, super stilettos and mask over my eyes….my husband comes back from work, opens the door and says: “Hi Batman, what’s for dinner?”
Soaked & Cooked Tender Beans? ~ I prepare dried beans two ways. When I think ahead I cook them in a slow cooker overnight with seasonings, on a warm setting and then a few hours the next day on low. Or if I forget, I use the stove-top/oven method that does the same in a couple of hours. The oven seems to work better than using just the stove, making a faster, tender pot of beans. Here's how: cover the washed beans with about 2-inches of water in a dutch oven with a tight fitting lid. Preheat oven to 325 degrees F. Add your seasonings (don't
Excellent beer. Trappists know what they're doing.
A: Fish
- SNS integration
Sweet Li: Are you Amy?
The best way to move things or people on a country road is a pickup truck.
Churchill’s Private Secretary Montague-Brown to Civil Servant Johnston 2/11/1954 on an article in the Telegraph of 19 Oct in which the Jamaican Minister of Labour said he would not attempt to stop mass immigration. The P.M. thinks this should be brought up in Cabinet.
Will Chow from Dagobah leave?
“We are reiterating our demand that Oil Deregulation Law should be scrapped because it only allows the Big 3 – Shell, Petron and Caltex, to continue on increasing the price of petroleum products and leaving the government incapacitated in controlling oil price even when necessary,” Orendain said.
I’m sure there are plenty of twenty-five-year olds that would envy the folks in these films.
It stuck in my mind, maybe because the one overriding memory from my Blog-camping weekend in Berlin is the laughter, the constant laughter. It was the kind of bodily laughter that inhibits speech and makes your sides ache. I don’t know if a lot of wit was involved, at least on my part, but certainly I was silly, irreverent and raunchy – qualities that don’t get a lot of play in my “normal” life.
Beyond the Cusp
One of the best new toys being added to everyone’s shelf these days is the digital camera. While they have been around for a bit, people were a little slow in taking to them. That has all changed over the last couple of years and digital camera sales are soaring. For any new camera owner, you may need to know about some camera accessories that you should not be without.
3.2 Inch 16 Million Colour TFT Capacitive Touch Screen (240 x 400 Pixels)
Morgen: Isn’t it great, because I know when reading something how easy it is to think, “Oh yes that was good” and move on rather than taking the effort to contact the author and let him / her know. Now I’m on the receiving end I do make sure I do. Apart from being a very solitary life (which I love) to know someone appreciates what we’ve created is a big reason why we do it. Writing should be written to be read. What is your creative process like? What happens before sitting down to write?
July is here, and the first day brought a lot of much needed rain. Hoping tomorrow morning goes well, prayer and positive thoughts definitely needed.
or I can let go. I suspect you
Deeply understanding Chinese customers
It is the near death or rather “extinctions” of these companies that have led them to hold these ridiculous amounts of cash tightly. But Mr. Cook has decided that a 1.8 annual yield on the company’s stock would be the right choice. However, this is still below some competitors. Microsoft pays a 2.5 percent dividend, Intel pays a 3 percent dividend and Hewlett-Packard pays a 2 percent dividend.
Deciding on changes in business strategy
Sixth, I believe in the brotherhood of all English-speaking peoples. In spite of my desire for political independence from Washington DC, that does not mean I harbour animosity toward any other English-speaking people, neither toward my Yankee and Canadian cousins up North, nor toward my English and Australian blokes across the ponds. We are all part of a great and glorious Anglosphere, and there is no shame in celebrating that. It is our common heritage and our common bond. I look forward to the day when all Anglosphere countries (including Dixie) will stand united in a commonwealth of brotherhood that respects our individual sovereignty as independent nations, yet promotes our economic and cultural well-being as common peoples. The future world I see for the English-speaking people is bigger and better than the one that currently exists.
Yup, I got rushed through my appointment so that my doctor could play dress up and have a photo shoot right after. So there I am getting my prescription filled as I watch the doctor walk over to the window, putting on her white lab jacket, as she starts her glamour shot session with the photographer; the scene was both extremely uncomfortable and annoying.
1. The nobility, the skaa, and the Lord Ruler have integral roles in the novel and yet we haven’t really interacted with them much. Do you think there is a reason for this? Have you formed an opinion about them?
This was our nummy Thanksgiving turkey. It's been many moons since Mrblocko or I cooked a turkey and we were a bit rusty. We did pretty darn good if I say so myself. We didn't really do anything special. Just rubbed herbed butter over and under the skin and let it sit in some chicken stock as it cooked.
So you're a writer, are you? If you're a writer, what are you writing? This is the last chance you'll get to pimp your work here, because I won't be asking again. See above about how I think we should talk sports.
While I was blog-hopping, I get a chance to enter for this amazingly huge candy :).
We must remember that Paul was a student of Old Testament Scriptures. He could cite numerous examples of how the Lord ordered the steps of His people. The children ofIsraelspent 400 years inEgypt, most of that time as slaves. They were His people; His chosen race. And yet this time was needed to develop as a nation numerically, physically and emotionally.
6. What has been your biggest acievement?
Enter this code in checkout for discount 163AFF75in
Happy weekend, dear friends!
In conclusion, a lovely discovery and I hope I find their wine on a wine list soon so that I can actually have the opportunity to enjoy their wine without the need to spit it out.
Gender: Ryan thinks boy. I think boy.
Traditionally, lahpet is offered to guests during ceremonies, to monks on their initiation, and to the gods of the forests. It was also used as a peace offering after war, as a symbol of putting the past behind.
*Please do not link to giveaways or stores. We love them, but this is not the place for that.
But back to North Carolina and Amendment One itself. Amendment One doesn’t JUST prevent the state from recognizing marriage between same-sex couples. It ALSO prevents recognition of non-married couples regardless of the gender makeup, which potentially has negative implications for HETEROSEXUAL couples as well.
And on that note, I'll be back on line on October 18th or 19th, unless I'm shocked and find that one of the spooky old manor houses has wireless...hmm.
CREDIT CRUNCH
Near the pools, you can see the new Freedom Tower rising up into the sky.
One night the leader's voice is heard to say, "Now's the time". The dragons fly away.
Tomorrow they plan to head East, even though they don't know where the Animal Island actually is. God help them.
﻿Here's a look at our wall transitions over the past year and a half.
“Small island developing states can leap toward the goal of a poverty free and prosperous future by changing their energy sectors,” said Prime Minister Stuart. “Just weeks before the Rio+20 Conference, our countries can rally the international community with a unified voice, sharing our aspiration to become fully sustainable, and to contribute to a meaningful outcome of the meeting in Rio de Janeiro.” More
Spiced Simple Syrup--
Giving a gift to a teacher? Find fabric with apples, numbers for a math teacher, etc. For Halloween there are tons of fun fabrics. You get the point.
Eight players in the NBA attempted at least 850 shots and had a field goal percent of 43% or worse. Two of those players were Washington Wizards John Wall and Jordan Crawford. The Wizards are the only team with two players on that list.
Considering the weighty responsibilities of the members of the College of Cardinals in assisting the Holy Father as his closest co-workers, even “to the shedding of blood,” I am more than ever conscious of my own weakness and of my total dependence upon the help of divine grace, in order that I may fulfill worthily and generously the responsibilities which will be mine, God willing, as a Cardinal of the Church.
This question of how authorities should respond when flawed forensics are discovered will continue to come up, and not just at the federal level. Here in Texas when flawed arson science was uncovered in the Todd Willingham and Ernest Willis cases, the Forensic Science Commission partnered with my employers at the Innocence Project of Texas and the state fire marshal to reexamine old arson cases for possible false convictions. And when the El Paso crime lab was found to be employing an incompetent analyst, DA Jaime Esparza was praised for notifying local defense counsel. OTOH, when Texas appellate courts decided dog-sniff lineups weren't good enough evidence to support a conviction, nobody in officialdom ever tried to identify the 2,000 cases where Deputy Keith Pikett claimed to have performed the technique, much less instances where flawed testimony may have been central to securing a conviction. And the Texas Court of Criminal Appeals has generally refused to grant habeas writs based on debunked scientific testimony, even when it was central to securing a conviction. So as a practical matter Texas' response to flawed forensics, while superior in some cases to the feds', has overall been rather hit or miss.
Hold your most exclusive private events on the manor’s third floor, where you can dine under a portrait of Baroness Ivana herself in the richly decorated Red Room, or “Jewel of Russia” room, flooded in rosy light, or host in grand proportions in the LV Room—with access to a private roof garden with glittering city views. FireBird will work with you to commission customized menus for each event— from à la carte to Russian family-style—live music, and even a private entrance with keys for your guests.
Other: Stripes EF, Scallop Trim Border Punch, Pear Pizzazz Seam Binding, Scallop Circle Nesties, Magnetic Snaps (non SU)
So that's it for me today. Hope everyone has a good weekend!
Married to Garry (weeks off 44)
Anyway, I'm sure you can tell this is not a 4th of July post. But since so many people are writing them, then I don't feel obliged to. Last night I went to Tosca to help bid Bon Voyage to a friend (and former colleague and sister layoff-ee) who is going to Scotland to live with her sweetie and start a new life in Glasgow.
When you see a thief, you make him your friend, *
+UP rewards = Rite Aid reward program (coupons good on your next order)
Spanish police swooped on the resort this week after a tip-off from colleagues in Portugal.
So that means, I too, must hustle outside and finish planting projects that were purchased last week before rain hits. Although, after Saturday’s weather, do I really want to take a chance on planting them only to have them ripped apart with rain/hail/wind? Oh yeah, I don’t gamble. Right. So maybe I’ll just keep pulling them in and out of the garden shed…in at night to keep pesky weather away, out during day for sunlight and water. But in order to do all that plant-pulling-around, I must have reliable and roomy wheels.
His 9-9-9 plan was a resounding dud
Here's Laura to tell the tale of the cover:
"Yogurt."
immunodeficiency,alcoholism; chronic hepatic, renal, or pulmonary disease;
14. Morse Moose and the Grey Goose
And remember how the last movie started with a wrestling match flashing back to medieval Scotland? Well, this movie starts out with an opera:
My guilty pleasure is ghost-hunting reality TV shows. I have actually gone on a few ghost hunts myself!
Oh, where to start, people...
However, that night, I had to go to a conference. (I promise, I'm getting to the positive side effect). It was called Sexy Christians and it was really great. But to start off, we worshiped. And I stood up, on shaking legs, and began to sing "Everlasting, Your light will shine when all else fails... From the inside out, oh my soul cries out..." and I started to cry. It was taking everything I had to stand up and I was singing with all my heart and soul and I felt like God was honoring my sacrifice of doing that. And then, as I sat down, I thanked God because I wasn't alone that night I was so sick. He gave me my mom and Ty.
I love shopping at Zappos.com. I actually just ordered a Christmas present from them two days ago for my boyfriend. I purchased it later at night (it was probably around 7pm or so) and it showed up the next day. Well, I should say the next morning. By the time I got home from my class (10am) it was there and waiting for me. Talk about fast shipping! And the best part, it was free shipping, I had qualified for free 1 day shipping.
Wonka Wonka Kochalka is merely the first chapter (of 13) of Max Ink's next Blink graphic novel to be entitled So It Goes. (By the way, the first book in the series, So Far, took second place in the General category for the 2011 SPACE Prize, to be presented at this year's show) If you didn't get a copy Friday, it's currently available on Amazon. No doubt it will also be available at several comic shops in the Columbus area, and you'll have another opportunity to buy it from Max himself later this month at SPACE.
Think thou that I and my brethren were ever thus? We once walked with men in an age before thy reckoning. We were scholars, prying at the seams of Truth, seeking the answers to all questions. We learned them. We Know.
At some point I had some Weickse Wheat, but found it be a basic wheat beer.
I recently shared with you my wooden egg wreath which is now hanging above my mantel. Today, I want to share with you the wreath that is hanging on my front door. It is made of plastic Easter eggs and was super easy to make.
I received an email the other day from a company who are about to launch a new range of craft beers in the UK, and being the sort of guy who is instinctively hostile toward such an approach - I wrote back immediately telling them in no uncertain terms that they could jolly well send me as many samples as they liked.
It couldn’t be anything else. Iron Man was what started the whole franchise. If Iron Man was not a success then The Avengers sure as hell would not be happening this year or any time in the near future. Iron Man became one of the greatest comic book movies so far; the characters were great, the special effects on the Iron Man suit itself were outstanding. Where Marvel’s characters had appeared in films before (not mande by the studio itself) they had either gone too cheesy (Fantastic Four) or dark and gritty (X-men), but Iron Man managed to combine the two and instantly became a classic. We got Tony’s charm, his wit, his playboy lifestyle combined with the underlying story of terrorism and arms dealings. Iron Man is brilliant and we all have this to thank for The Avengers.
Hope you enjoyed our first day in England. Hope to see you again next week!
The reunited band may also tour South America and, at some point, complete work on the album of new material it was in the process of recording with Brendan O'Brien before things went awry.
It has been a stressful three weeks. I have been worried about my students, and let’s face it, I have been angry with them too. And almost everyone in our learning space has felt it. There have been moments when I have been inclined to punish my students by yanking their privileges. That would have been easy and spiteful and would have made me feel good in the short term.
Jen W and Sinta
Did you try or buy any of the vintage thermal knit tops this season from J.Crew?
It’s full of life, and it is all
Observe the Universe?
In The “What’s for Dinner” Solution, popular author and speaker Kathi Lipp provides a full-kitchen approach for getting dinner on the table every night. After putting her 21-day plan into action, women will
7. But Not For Me
Something happened at the zoo yesterday- I don't know if I'd call it a break through but some kind of shift of understanding.....
But when it comes down to it, I have been forced to ask myself if I really believe the things I confess to believe. Is the God I say I believe in really big enough to handle my questions, and my anger, and my hurt? Yes. Can I trust Him enough to believe that this path He's chosen for me is the best path FOR ME? Yes. Even if it includes illness and pain? Yes. Does that take away the pain? No. Does it help to know that I'm not alone in my pain? Yes. Does it help to know that there is some purpose to my pain? Yes. Does it help to remember that in life, our biggest lessons are always learned through times of pain and hurt? Yes! Has this brought me back to my knees, where I belong? Yes!
We have a boat, which is great for wake-boarding, water-skiing, and fun boat rides.
Social networking has become an integral part of today’s education. Students can better engage in the learning process when combining classroom activities with online activities. Parents can better guide their children with homework if they are well informed. Now if only teachers can control who can participate in these online social communities, information can freely flow similar to a traditional classroom setting. Now you can with Novachi’s Teacher Classroom Collaboration (TCC).
For with this power,
VERITAS Volume Manager Management Services Provider
Asafoetida- half sp
3. The EC should immediately withdraw its decision of barring mobile phones to ensure transparency and greater accountability in the electoral process. The EC must also progressively accept polling and counting agents’ use of new methods of monitoring the electoral process such social media and other technologies as long as they do not violate the Election Offences Act 1954.
Executive Summary – Company Page for Your Company
Even those of us who love Britain and its indigenous people, must confess to a twinge of appalled embarrassment when members of that uncouth and ill educated section of our countrymen appear before a national, and sometimes, international audience.
However, because I’m human and appreciate company, sometimes going solo does bother me. Since the recent beefs I had with two of my friends with whom I often went out on the town with, I’ve found myself feeling locally lonely.
1) Tell us about your featured tattoo- is there a background story about why you chose it, or maybe a special meaning?
59 It follows that the sign CARGO PARTNER is, from the point of view of the relevant public, devoid of any distinctive character within the meaning of Article 7(1)(b) of Regulation 40/94 as far as services of transport and packaging and storage of goods are concerned".The IPKat has some sympathy for the applicant. While the mark is not a terribly elegant or exciting one, it strikes him as an Anglophone Kat that the words, taken globally (a word that does not appear in this decision), jar somewhat because they are not a normal idiom. Expressions in English that contain 'partner' (bridge partner, tennis partner, sleeping partner, senior partner, partner in crime) tend to be well-worn usages that have a meaning of their own. But to tack 'partner' on to other words (eg. pencil partner, sausage partner, newspaper partner, flower partner) would sound distinctly odd and might arguably therefore be distinctive.
Analytical dimorphism dissolved
Meroe, Capitol of Kushite Empire
Listen to the sound of the mood of the house change as Sassy and Action blow in from school
This sounds SERIOUS and BIG but it isn't. It is more like a haze, a wash; not debilitating, but it is my truth. I wish I could say otherwise, I wish I could say I've relaxed into poopy diapers and baby-sized food and crumbs down my shirt and the wonder of folding pairs of tiny socks... but really, no. There are poopy diapers, and baby food, and crumbs and wonder, but there is also this ever-present tinge of disbelief, this veil of something that feels like a kind of distance, like in the old days when I held myself separate to keep myself safe. It is a little like that but with a big big difference. I am also much closer to my own heart than I've ever been. So to call it distance is not quite fair. I've never been this rawboned, this opened up, this filled with an inexpressible love.
Under the theme Superheroes the sit years old label showed us colourful outfits with crazy patterns.
17. 3/27/2011. O Face: Poetry and Fashion and Oprah's Magazine. This was one of those posts where I was responding to a controversy in the lit scene, namely, the recent spread in O Magazine starring young female poets, but really made me want to dialogue about a lot of the anti-fashion vibes I was getting in response to this, wanting to create a continuum with these modernist women I was working with.
Then restart Backup Exec service.
reception: Private Estate in Atherton
When a desperate Bridget drives too fast and crashes her car, she ends up in limbo, facing everyone she’s wronged and walking a few uncomfortable miles in their shoes. Now she has only one chance to make a last impression. Though she might end up dead, she has one last shot at redemption and the chance to right the wrongs she’s inflicted on the people who mean the most to her.
Please copy the following html code if you wish to add our button to your site:
I happen to love it but only if it doesn't have nuts. Or raisins. Nothing against nut and raisins - I like them, just not in my cake.
Wedding rings on or off? Off, unfortunately I had to take my rings off at about week 14.
Another thing we got to do was attend a Wednesday night prayer service. I don’t have the slightest clue what they were saying as they were singing but Jesus was in the room. You could just feel him there. One of the deacons spoke and was really thankful that we were there showing God’s love to the kids. It didn’t matter that they were a different race, spoke a different language, and lived different lifestyles…they still need to be loved.
Mark: Phil Collins? That's like easy listening.
You sleep soooo well. And often. You love to sleep.
PAWS of Lynnwood is a nonprofit organization which finds families for homeless pets and rehabilitates wildlife. They also have a cat adoption center in Greenwood called PAWS Cat City.
8. You will not have to pay a failure-to-file or failure-to-pay penalty if you can show that you failed to file or pay on time because of reasonable cause and not because of willful neglect.
GFL (Galactic Federation of Light)
Those things that had all that extra time to grow and grow and grow…. Nothing was able to come in it to challenge them…. so…. they could just stay in the comfort of those walls and get stronger.
I've been in the bottom of a glacier crevasse, on top of many mountains, broken my leg skiing, nearly frightened myself to death more times than I care to remember being half way up a rock climb that really I shouldn't have been on.
Clairol Nice ‘n Easy Foam or Perfect 10 hair color $3/1
Today's recipe is left over from my holiday candy making. These turtles always look so cute, and people are always impressed. Make them now for a sweet treat, or add them to your Valentine's Day "must make" list!
The plan for today is to trace wires and mark them on the panel which the previous owner never got around to doing. If the power comes on I might never know otherwise as I have shut off the Main Breaker since we are unsure as to what breakers go to the Water Heater and The Boiler.
and DC will have a wider range of books starting in September, DiDio says. In addition, three-quarters of the creative teams will be shuffled around — series that are successful and writer/artist combinations that work well together won't be tweaked too much, he says.
Nceba Sodo: “One bullet one white infant, one rope one sellout’ …
**Oh, and YG? If I die, and you read this many years from now? I love you too, and very dearly, at that. Oh, and by the way, that tube top makes you look like a hussy.
This is one of my best recent recipe finds! I am so thrilled to now be able to make my own curry paste from home. The smell and taste was identical, if not better, than store bought; and my version is free from preservatives, hidden fats and sugars. And of course, it was very gratifying to smell, and see, the aromatic spices blending in my own kitchen. Makes 1 cup
On arrival at the gig, we climbed out of the van, (filled with equipment, we learn fast!) and perused the poster for the gig. The headline act was listed as something called “Dylan For The Deaf”.
loves food
In a world of seemingly endless movement, when fluttering shadows waltz upon the dash and crash of our ever days, there are single points on which stillness cradles. These are the times of reflection, when the streaming currents pass on either side and yet not through. On today's dawn, in the cooling archways of outstretched archways, such a moment rose. And I wondered of those who had come and gone before, flashes on the most brilliant horizons. To pause and breathe, feeling the physical effort of oxygen intake - we can almost feel each second slipping away.
Here is my newest creation...a bookmark! I made this for the latest Shining the Light Challenge on Our Daily Bread Designs which you can find here. The challenge was to make any type of bookmark, using one of their stamps.
Girl A told police that she had been raped and provided DNA evidence from her attacker, however the CPS twice decided not to prosecute him.
The documentary appears on the website without narration or voiceover, suggesting that what had been posted may not be the final version of the show.
I am going to be kissing these two men more than usual this week:
I know I got a lot of exercise the last few years,...... just getting over the hill.
How crazy is that?
I realize now as I’m writing this post, that this particular recipe reminds me of Stratford more than I thought. It’s different, packed with smoky flavor, and would be the perfect, post-show late night snack. Not to mention, it’s gluten-free for those who prefer that kind of dish.
Now, finally, the Canucks. I don't have a lot to say except that I am really, really, really excited. For those of you who are clueless as to what I am talking about: The Vancouver Canucks, Vancouver's hockey team, is going to be playing for the Stanley Cup. I hope, I really, really, hope I can find a place to watch some of the games.
That was all he had to offer as the flywheel of his watch wound down. He smiled as he thought about the fact that he would never have to wind it again. He lit up another cigarette, but lost in thought, let it smolder idly.
I'll guess I'll change my name
Wide receiver Justin Blackmon has sometimes been given the term “diva wide receiver” for his play and antics on the field. However, I have been told and seen for myself that Blackmon simply is a competitor who wants the ball in key/clutch situations. Although he sometimes comes across as a player who is playing the game for himself and his own stats, that could be very far from the truth. Blackmon comes from a military background and upbringing from his father and I have been told that he couldn’t be a more down to earth player off the football field. Watching more film on Blackmon I have noticed that these accusations could be unwarranted to a degree as Blackmon proved in this game to be a reliable team-mate who is a more effective blocker on the outside than he is given credit for. Blackmon did a good job positioning his body to seal off and keep his defender at bay and away from the ball-carrier. I liked to see this effort from Blackmon as some have questioned his effort in this area, especially when he isn’t the focus of the play. Justin Blackmon also has big strong hands and is a natural hands plucker. I love the big frame he has, as he squares his body to his quarterback, creating a big target for his quarterback to get him the football. Blackmon’s catching radius is also very impressive and has been reported to be as large as a two car garage by ESPN’s Sport Science…the same they measured for All-Pro NFL wide receiver Calvin Johnson of the Detroit Lions. On top of this Justin Blackmon shows incredible ability while the football is in the air. This was never more evident than when Blackmon timed his jump absolutely perfectly and made an adjustment to the football while in the air. This play led to a TD for Blackmon and Oklahoma State and spoke to Blackmon’s unique and extremely gifted ability to use his body in space as his spacial/kinesthetic awareness skills have alwasy been very good. I also enjoyed watching Blackmon compete after the catch showing good running ability and physicality as he routinely fought for extra yards instead of simply heading for the sidelines. This speaks to the type of competitor and player Justin Blackmon is and I have very little doubt that he is the most gifted receiver in the 2012 NFL Draft. I wouldn’t say that Blackmon is elite and worthy of a Top 5 pick, just because his top end speed and ability to stretch the defense isn’t on par with other game changing receivers that have went high in past drafts, but Blackmon is a top 6-8 prospect in my mind. He struggled a bit with the physical play of Iowa State cornerback Leonard Johnson but was able to hold his own for the most part finishing with 10 receptions for 99 yards and a TD.
It's been wonderful watching our family grow and seeing Esme and Jacob become big 'sister' and big 'brother' this year too. Jacob has really taken to the role and adores Gideon. There's nothing he won't do for his little brother. And I think the love is mutual too - Gideon always has a smile for Jacob whenever he sees him. Esme, on the other hand, likes to smother him a little too much!
5. God will bless your fruitfulness. “No one shall suffer miscarriage or be barren in your land;” (v. 26). –Divine abundance!
I just need some time in a beautiful place to clear my head. And to see if being in another city helps me. I don’t know how I got to be in the rut I was trapped in in Memphis, but I know it wasn’t good. And so I had to change it.
The winter brews have arrived! We have already tried 6 seasonal brews and it is only December 2nd. With so many more to try and write about I am excited for the next 2 months. If you have any winter seasonal's you think I should try, leave a comment after this post, I really appreciate it. Check the list on the right to see if I have tried it before you post!
With the heat cranked up, there’s no way Scott’s going to the cops with what he knows. He begins to use his skills as a thief to set up the mayor and crush his plans. Unfortunately for Scott, there’s bad news creeping up: Jones finds out who he is, and what’s worse – so does Mayor Stone. The mayor sets a deadly trap for the little punk, leading to a brutal showdown between Scott, Detective Jones and the sleeper cell. Outnumbered and out of time, there’s only one chance left for Scott to save his life, and hopefully his freedom – or there’s gonna be a whole lot of killing going on.
So, things have been pretty busy lately - been doing the normal grind for work and been trying to relax as much as I can with Theresa on the weekends. I figured that now would be a good time to do a little gut check in regards to a few goals that I set for the year.
Camera: Canon PowerShot
Things are heating up…
One of the most exciting concerts was held in the Prince Felipe Auditorium Oviedo. The Oviedo String Orchestra and choir hosted the joint concert, which presented the Spanish premiere of Himno Jubileo. The final concert of this tour was performed in the Guggenheim Museum, Bilbao.
Military engagement will be conducted by Plejaran fleet in command of Semjase and Remiz of Erra. Efforts will be made by Arcturian and Andrmedan ships to relocate people who will be in danger, but the logistics of moving millions is daunting. It is inevitable many will lose their lives, but the bases pose a larger threat of greater global harm. Those selected for future migration to Hope will be taken a week before the attacks; however, they will not be abducted, per se, but given a choice to reloacte to Hope or stay on earth.
Hickman Bridge forms a natural frame overlooking sandstone domes on a sunny afternoon in Capitol Reef National Park.
Now call it simplistic, but I see a solution.
I remembered Alison had told me not to ask her questions as that upsets her, but just to listen or speak in statements. We walked around the facility and I listened and watched as Paula had a conversation with herself almost the entire time. Occasionally I'd chime in with something, and she would look at me, agree, then go right back to her inner talk.
But we’re all sinners to this effect (not in the biblical sense), right now I have a Powerpoint document open with several thousand characters of sociology work mid-writing, Facebook, Stumbleupon and WordPress. I don’t remember the last time I had less than one browser whirling away. Are you doing the same? It makes me feel like I need to go and find a quiet place outdoors to paint or climb or just see to balance out the technical toxins that tak me away from actual reality and into the warped place where anything can happen and usually does all at once. On holiday it took me two days just to slow my pace, I saw four places in just one day, running around but not stopping to go ahhh this is nice, as the week drew on and I realised there was no rush, visiting places is not an assignment due in the next day or an urgent appointment with someone important. It’s time to slow down, let go and just be you. And dear god, was it good.
Thanks to economies of scale and continuous investments in R&D, there are plenty of foreign carmakers that are selling much nicer cars, priced not much higher than Proton here and far cheaper overseas.
“The beaver–nature’s engineers.”
- Foreigners may be barred from the country if their presence upsets “the equilibrium of the national demographics,” when foreigners are deemed detrimental to “economic or national interests,” when they do not behave like good citizens in their own country, when they have broken Mexican laws, and when “they are not found to be physically or mentally healthy.” (Article 37)
On to the card components: I chose Penny Black Pieces of Quiet for the image and sentiment, and stamped them on X-Press It blending CS with Memento ink. This was mounted on Stampin' Up CS and Lily Bee Design Picket Fence designer paper. Stampin' Up ink was rubbed around the image and the sentiment. I punched the corners of the sentiment with the Stampin' Up Ticket Corner punch. My dies for this card were Spellbinders Circles, Grand Circles, Scalloped Circles, and Stars. I also used a Marianne Designs Bird Scissors die. The die-cut scissors and the image scissors were coated with Glossy Accents. The image was accented with a Signo Uniball white gel pen. And my Copics were: Y00, Y02, Y06, BG70, BG72, E0000, E000, E00, E02, E07, E09, E11, E13, E25, E31, E50, C00, C0, C1, C2, C3, and C4.
Claus Oberhauser, University of Innsbruck
Slab City is an off-the-grid community where squatters and seasonal snowbirds live in RVs and vehicles among the concrete remnants of an abandoned Navy base. Located close to the Salton Sea, east of Niland, Slab City isn't actually a city at all - it's more a loose community of squatters, snowbirds and nomads who've pitched camps across 640 acres of open desert. Slab City and Salvation Mountain are quite a site to see, although a bit scary for my eyes. It seems to be locked in the 1960s with the only evidence of current times being solar panels, satellite dishes, fancy RVs and off road toys.
So, March was an awful month. Beyond awful. But as much as I wish I could vent away about all that went wrong in March I'm just not comfortable.
Today my son has come back to The Lord through many more Miraculous events. When we out for dinner last week my son told us he wants to attend Bible College.
Concluding thoughts
According to Bealer, they drilled two parallel rows of holes into their benchtops. The workpiece was placed on-edge between the holes, and tall pegs were slipped into the holes. In between the workpiece and pegs, they placed thick wedges.
Me: Because it’s Sunday.
I pray that we can get this under control and he will not have GERD (Gastroesophageal reflux disease) like Aidan did. What a nightmare it was for him. He literally lost weight as he got older and was in the low percentile range his entire first year... usually around 5%.
- You want to see what all the hub-bub is about.
I discovered this building thanks to Edward Jones and Christopher Woodward's 'A guide to the Architecture of London' and spent a pleasant meandering morning reaching it through a cornucopia of interesting urbanity on a beautiful sunny pre-easter saturday.
If Socialist candidate Francois Hollande is elected, Germany loses its French toady.
Demanding perfection in any area of our lives will make disappointment inevitable and prevents us from living with true Joy.
If the person that is facilitating the coaching …does not make the coaching …fun…interactive…positive…and worthwhile…the coaching is a waste of time…
I pulled myself together, made lunch, and watched it be eaten by people who didn’t know its full value. Each second I had to push away my feelings of anxiety and choose to give with joy. I don’t know what my face looked like. I feel terrible for being such a poor host. I was not feeling very generous or hospitable. It was not my best day.
That means some long songs, mellotron, hammond, flute, vintage guitars and that warm analogue sound. First impression is they must be into bands like Jethro Tull, Queen, Genesis and cohorts, because that is what it reminded me of at first play.
ancient and modern ideas of dance, pagan rites and techno-pagan
The whole mask thing came with the group when it originated in China I believe. We have been around for a while.
I know many of you have done exactly this so if you have any advice for me don't hold back, Id really appreciate it.
The dramatic long-term decline of pub beer sales still isn’t fully appreciated
And then the smell changes -
After that day we started the process of getting a Lawyer “Christian”. My son was facing potentially seven years in prison. The lengthy court process began and felt like years. But in the midst of it all my Lord and Savoir had incredible compassion on my son. There is just too much miraculous events to write about. My son ended up with no jail time. Just community service, counseling, and restitution.
Spend 80% on stuff you know works and 20% on measurable innovation.
The title came to me when I was watching the Tina Turner music video for Golden Eye, like most Jame Bond intro songs this one was a top one. As was the film to be fair.
Muslim home diminishes their Muslim identity.” Molley Dagget, MSW,
I haven’t had any work at all this year and wouldn’t you know it, yesterday I got an email asking for a rush job. It isn’t big, but since I have been cleaning out my office in hopes of replacing the rug with hard flooring, my work computer was not in operation. I tried to work on my laptop, but couldn’t get the one program to run right and it didn’t have the reference material on it that I needed. So, I found a stand, put it in front of the couch, and put the CRT monitor on it. Got the computer sitting on the floor beside the couch. I then did the flat layouts that my customer wanted. The problem was I was in such a hurry I really screwed it up. I was sitting here last night watching TV and it hit me what I had done. I emailed my customer telling him to delete what I had sent him. I called him this morning and confirmed that he was to delete it all. He knows that I know how to do it, but sometimes I guess I just don’t think before I act. He said that was OK that we all have had days like that. Now, I better get it right this time. You would think that I would learn to not rush, but it is hard to teach old dogs new tricks.
be prepared for anything, stay fit, straight mind
This set-up is the same as my traveling vacation mini-book from 2010 (and the results are here). This has been my favorite mini-book, both in process and in final product, so I decided to follow the pattern for my December Daily this year.
The editorial freelance work I did was very measured and purposeful – each piece was designed to accomplish a specific objective. This was a great way to practice writing with a focus, which sometimes is useful and sometimes confining, but it was nice to recognize the distinction.
This week’s Blog Love goes out to… Meals and Miles – One Girl’s Journey Through Food and Running.
I have listened to most of them several times and always pick up new gems along the way. Piper puts a huge amount of time into preparation going to primary source material, so unless you are a scholar of Christian biography you will almost certainly find new encouragements in them.
The open road vs. the locked apartment
must be set free.
After the death of Mao, the position of General Secretary of the CCP (Mao’s position in the CCP) is used as the consolidation of public power and the source of renewed legitimacy. General Secretary of the CCP is also made President of the PRC and chair of the Central Military Commission. The General Secretary is certified by various factions within the political sphere. Most importantly the person holding the position has to have a theoretical contribution to the Party way of rule. So the CCP very clearly is constantly seeking new approaches to their rule. The party uses constant change, in order to maintain constant sources of legitimacy in order to not lose control of their hegemonic power.
Let’s say the project sold is a romance novel (because publishers offer all the time to unagented romance authors). It will be an original mass market (which tends to be standard). The price point will be $6.99 with an initial print run of 30,000 copies.
A few weeks ago, we caught an episode of Diners, Drive-ins and Dives where they were cooking cabbage with bacon and onion. It was filmed so vividly we could practically smell it and the Mister and I looked at each other like "oh yeah....we've gotta have some of that." The bug was planted. He and I love cabbage. I usually stir-fry it with some garlic salt, fennel seed and a little balsamic vinegar, but this looked even better. I fished around online until I found something from All Recipes that sounded about right.
Liquidity
The poor women in an area make incense for work and this is how they make money to keep her family alive. But then a big British Tobacco company trades to India, to globalize their company, there incense for much less than the poor women charge so thus the poor women and their area is wiped out.
God, thanks for my hands. Please, use them again."
The preacher finished up his sermon and we all watched solemnly as the coffin was lowered into the grave. Now seemed like the right time for tears, but my eyes were dry and no one else was choking up. Auntie couldn't even hide her smile anymore.
*A Riot squad guard gives Pendragon a file. Pendragon begins to read it.*
I want house plants.
I just returned home from a three day business trip to Chicago. The good news is that I slept for most of the trip. The not so good news is that I broke my diet big time (as expected). The biggest diet offender was ginger margaritas from the Pump Room. Buenisimo!
To get you in the mood for the weekend, every Friday we'll be celebrating 'FRIDAY NIGHT FEVER', featuring an old New York nightlife haunt, from the dance halls of 19th Century Bowery, to the massive warehouse spaces of the mid-90s. Past entries can be found here
- 1 lb farfalle
It stays cold, though we have rain today so it might clear some of the snow. And we researched the cat wee on the beds problem – it appears they are prone to it when stressed. Recently, the kittens’ mother Pansy the Terminator-cat has been around the catflap being extremely aggressive so that explains a lot. Meg is on Pansy-patrol, she thinks it’s highly entertaining so let’s see if she can see the source of the stress back to Tulip farm where she (and her daughters) came from.
Tuesday night was a reception that we couldn’t make it to, but we did go to the Wednesday engagement (swayambar) and wedding (bihaa). These last three days (Tuesday, Wednesday, and Thursday) are sahith, which Tri translated as “an auspicious time,” so there have been lots of wedding this week.
Jeb Blount, Joshua Schneyer – Reuters, 01/26/2012
The horror of it! Since Mr Littlewood believes we could manage with fewer regulations a sensible person would conclude that his appointment was a modest but good thing. Apparently not.
The Sookie Books as some people know them are the books that the HBO show called True Blood is named after. The reason that I bring this series up right now is because another one of the books is about to release in just a few short weeks. This is the sad part about having favorite authors. There are some that I just can not wait until they are cheap to buy them. Charlaine Harris is one of them.
According to them, intelligence reports showed one of his recruits was a 17-year-old student.
Oh, that Peter Stuyvesant. He was all about luxury, high class athletic sport and international travel. The Concorde! Monte Carlo! Caviar!
i'm starting to blog a lot more often...i think it makes me happy to get my wants, wishes and ideas out. And every once in a while share my day :)
So he packed up the cookies and put them in his little delivery truck,
If I’m deserving of a nomination then I know several others that are, as well:
a method which does not take the texts’ apparent contexts and intentions at face value, but looks at the doubts they repress or leave unsaid and how this repressed or “absent” element can undermine or undo what the text says.
What will Pakatan promise to do for the Malays in lieu of Ketuanan Melayu?
My "Beauty Funktion" necklace is in two toned colors of pink (background) and mirror pink (letters). It is very good in quality and beautifully made!
1903
There is also a nice video at the end of this post…I hope you’ll enjoy it!
Combine powdered sugar and 4 teaspoons of milk in a small bowl, and drizzle over cake. Let stand 10 minutes. Place chips in a small heavy duty zip top plastic bag; seal. Submerge bag in very hot water until chips melt, or microwave at medium high for 1 minutes. Snip a tiny hole in 1 corner of bag, and drizzle chocolate over cake.
At the same time, I had to look at the case as proof that, unlike most of the world’s court systems, the Israeli court system had done its absolute best to deliver a just verdict in spite of what must have been the court members’ almost unbearable personal grief.
and shaving my legs is a challenge.
1 1/3 cup all purpose flour
So the wifey goes to Target to get some things and also picked up my first 2012 Topps cards in the form of a blaster box. She also got a couple of these packs for the boys, supposedly as a reward (the older one is helping the younger one with potty training..they're 4 and 2 as of this posting).
Mantashe also urged Zanu-PF to continue talking to “those who don’t agree with us”, referring to the MDC.South Africa is the mediator in the years-long conflict between Zanu-PF and the MDC.
I've never had this happen before. Usually when I read a book I can put it firmly in one category: liked or disliked. Sometimes it's 'liked with some reservations', or 'disliked with some exceptions'. This is the first time I have ever read a book (or series of books) and been unable to decide whether I liked it or not.
Just stick your completed post-it request for attention on this wall here. Then someone can come out, grab a note, and take care of that one. As a plus we can see the post-it wall get smaller and smaller. (Visual reinforcement is so important to assure crowds that things are getting handled in a timely fashion)
Marionberry
Not that you haven’t been great with attention to detail in the past–it’s uncanny they way you’re able to make animated characters look like the voice actors who play them. Example: Jeremy Irons as Scar in The Lion King. Iconic, right? Now whenever I watch The Borgias I keep expecting the Pope to push someone off a cliff into a stampede of antelope. Although, to be fair, it’s something Alexander VI would probably have done if he had half the chance.
To quote Pogo, we have met the enemy and he is us.
Thank you Gail for having me today! I want you to know that I did all my own sawing and nailing on this project! With hubby out of town, I had no choice. ;-) It wasn’t to bad actually, I’m looking forward doing some more!
Should the Nigerian mobile phone users worry about the quality of TECNO’s phones? The fast growing telecom firm answered in the negative. “We have the top quality equipments which ensure us to manufacture high standard mobile products for each of our customers. We have quality control system with various segments of testing which helps us to provide the quality assured products to our partners.”
It is of course time for bed when Delia gets back. A cup of cocoa first and then bed. Bed at least takes the edge off of Raymond's acute annoyance. And as it happens Delia is more responsive than usual after an evening with Mr Plummer. Thinking of it, the enormity of it, that she can allow herself to be party to such a thing, and moreover the heart-stopping possibility that perhaps Raymond might find out... All of this does tend to make a young woman more active and responsive in the marital bed. Sex is a release, a relief, after all.
Since we were having our dinner in that restaurant and I leaned against you just to whisper to you “I have missed fucking your ass, baby!” … Since that time and you couldn’t sit still.
Our day ended by driving north through the Black Hills, northwestern South Dakota and into North Dakota. Once we were out of the Black Hills, our scenery was back to cattle, sheep, and grazing pasture land for as far as you could see. It got old as soon as it started. Tomorrow should be a fun day as we check out the Theodore Roosevelt National Park!
Suitcases
Shrugs. Dunno. Why not?
I am off to bed!
But yes, the work will continue and I am probably more receptive to it now than ever.
Lena: No! No! The child is mine!
First I will start with Shelly Laurenston cause ya-all know she’s my favorite. Shifter’s anyone? If you enjoy a good laugh, tough women, tougher men and action, you’ll adore Shelly Laurenston/G.A Aiken.
Casablanca train station into some dismal rain. Tonight, reluctant salvoes
Finally, if you are reviewing the 360 appraisal of a trainee, please don’t tell them it must be perfect – it is unrealistic, unreasonable, and results in a charade which helps no-one.
In October 2007, I entered a contest on gather.com — Court TV Search for the Next Great Crime Writer contest. The winner of the contest would win a $5,000 advance and a publishing contract. My entry, More Deaths Than One, was not a detective story, and it certainly is not a cozy mystery, but it is the story of a crime: identity theft. This theft is an actual theft of a man’s identity, not a paper one. So it did fit with the contest, though from reading the first chapter (all that was posted online for the contest), many people assumed it was a supernatural tale — as the blurb says, When Bob Stark returns home after spending eighteen years in Southeast Asia, he discovers that his mother Lydia Loretta Stark is dead again. When he attends her second funeral, he sees his brother, his college girlfriend, and . . . himself.
Jen xo
Shown up in Lauren’s ultrasound,”
The theft of the huia's tail feathers is now part of a police investigation.
A final inspiration to lead you into war
From shore to shore,
Number and type of food/drink consumer: No imbibement occurred as T. was driving and I was intensely schooling. I had a wrap of some sort and he had a salad. He also told me about his current diet – a theme with men that I meet. If any of you have hypotheses as to why, please do tell…. I’m at a loss.
DO: Think about adopting some sort of sign that tells your colleagues you are too busy to be interrupted. This does have to be quite forcefully maintained for it to be taken seriously by colleagues.
Closer to home, there was a lot of movement when Julia Gillard replaced Kevin Rudd as prime minister on 24 June 2010. One of the major players in that transition was Mark Arbib, who had been a senator since July 2008 (he has now resigned), representing New South Wales. A diplomatic cable of 20 July 2009 released by WikiLeaks on 28 October 2010 details Arbib's rise to prominence and also acknowledges his usefulness to the US administration.
Smiling up at her as his father had smiled.
Then Shaik and the arms deal transpired, and Zuma was tainted. And the rape case.
"look mom! it's the russian dance! that's what you did when you were a little girl!"
“A twin sister. Four minutes older. Marissa.”
Granted, our roommate is picky about fast food, but I wasn’t even in the mood for MEAT, let alone more nasty fast-food meat. I don’t do grease, I barely eat cheese, and fast-food meat… well, I had a hard enough time with a barbecue chicken sandwich this morning. I did NOT feel like it.
It took the 115-foot boat 584 days — roughly 19 month — to make it all around the world. That is admittedly not a super-fast pace.
What drives this kind of meddling, making the requirements of a wholly unloved law even stricter? I don't know, because the legislator who proposed it retired and went into lobbying (for a medical group, so the obvious answer doesn't apply).
The second thing that convinces John of this and comforts us is Jesus' names.
Cuttlebug: A2 Border
I could always take or leave most television shows, but 24 was different.
While I was at home, I accomplished so much. I maintain that I work best in the comfort of sweats, on the floor, with my tv on. It's just the way I've always been. I need distraction to function.
he'd cracked
When I’m rich, you can be my secretary. We would fuck all day long. ‘Give me those papers, Miss Sexypants’, I’d tell you, and you’d be like, ‘yes, sir’.
Over the next few days, Najib will also be announcing details of the minimum wage plan and there is also talk that the Government will unravel the nine-month Malaysia Airlines-Air Asia alliance as early as Wednesday.
Moon rushed by him.
6. Lonely Hard Road (Ballard) 4:23
Above: a dirty scan of a quick pencil sketch I did while watching TV.
There’s no limit on the number of bloggers participating and hey, if you aren’t an every day vegan, no worries. Just prepare something animal-free for the potluck. I’d love to have eaters and cooks of all kinds.
The most time spent, actually, was trying to line up the computer generated sentiments with the Cricut. In "theory", it's supposed to be simple. Welllll, I guess I didn't do it the "simple" way, because it took me SEVERAL tries. None the less, I didn't give up and persevered!!!!
You decide …
Cheers for reading, all the best from Steve (Stephane Bonnes Lookalike) at Total Celtic.
in furnaces great roar
No trimming unless it was absolute must.
Recipes and Ingredients
It is just so hard for me. I feel like I’m failing her by making her “uncomfortable” and in a way I am being selfish by bringing him around when I know she doesn’t like it. But, on the other hand I know that I am allowed to be happy and allowed to do things for myself. And what I’m doing isn’t harming anyone or illegal or even out of the ordinary. It’s not like I’m bringing a different guy home every day, week, month, hell even year. In three years he’s the first person I’ve brought home.
Discover new beer favorites as experts from America’s favorite breweries share their products and knowledge. Brew Masters from across the country, including Terence Sullivan of Sierra Nevada, Steven Pauwels of Boulevard Brewing Co. and Brad Farbstein of Real Ale, will partake in two weeks of classes in the CM Cooking School and samplings in the Beer Department.
Just detach yourself from all negativity
Acetate
I have very little debt. I have saved a decent amount of money. I have a very good life by all conventional barometers.
While hugging that litter bag,
Fair Trade
working extra hard, along with the other dealers,
will hide you if the world is folding
Her hair fluttered in the longshore breeze. Shells jabbed at the soles of her feet. Her eyes followed the strand curving in the distance.
your local pastor (mine freaks me out), your mother-in-law, your neighbor, your religious ex, Hitler and Benny Hill. Also consider the fact that if somebody like me makes it into heaven, they will be pointing at me and saying, “I told you so!”
For such a lousy team?
and then vertically. For the vertical stitches, I wove the thread over and under the horizontal thread. This was quite a challenge! In fact, I had to use a delicate sewing needle with a tiny eye rather than my usual embroidery needle. When I first started the repairing stitches, I used white sewing thread. The whites didn't quite match so it was very obvious and the sewing thread weight-wise was actually too coarse and heavy. I wasn't sure what sort of thread to use that would match both in color and weight. After a bit of experimenting, I ended up using a thread from my embroidery fabric! I carefully pulled the thread out of the weave along the cut edge of my fabric. It worked really well and you can barely see the repair.
Although the House of Lords report recommended tougher sanctions by insurers against ship and cargo owners who fail to take adequate precautions against piratical seizure, the Report recognises that
Read a book
Runner Up: St Eriks whisky aged Porter
You might think that since I'm going to a conference about blogging this week, I might just... I don't know, UPDATE my blog? Obviously not.
5. Organic Granny Smith or Fuji apples, .88/lb. at Sun Harvest (through 1/19/11)
Hope you will stop by!
And that’s where it all went horribly wrong. After standing back for three years, our ‘silent’ co-directors saw that all was becoming good, and wanted to buy me out for a pittance, but I didn’t want to sell so they went to law and shut us down.
Have a Great Day and Happy Stamping,
1 clean
Tomorrow I will be posting a third shelf sitter. He is nothing like the first two. I hope you come back to see him.
“Yeah but I think it’s better to keep me a little on the dressier side,” Mike said. “So people don’t think I’m a bum or something.”
Chris: And the 3 new arrivals are female voices, which is going to be a little strange for me, but I can deal with it…
Which is actually very strange, because at the same time you are one of the most reliable and dependable signs of the zodiac.
People of faith know that we will be judged by how we treated “the least of these” (Matthew 25:31-46). Do we feed the hungry or clothe the naked? Do our economic policies? We ought to keep that in mind when we go the ballot box. Because just in case you are wondering, “Are we our brothers’ and sisters’ keepers?” (ref. Genesis 4:13), the answer is yes. Yes, we are.
The New Jim Crow – Michelle Alexander
The Infusion Solution people are the ones that are taking care of my "nutritional" needs at the moment... A bag of white nutritionally sound food that is hooked up to my port. They monitor vitamin levels and etc. and continue to tweak a perfect combination just for me! The bag fits into a lovely normal sized back pack and I am free to go gallivant around the country side. So far it's attached 24/7 but should be tapering off, 18 hours/ 12 hours/ 8 hours? Not exactly sure. I can continue to eat if I want, but as usual not much stays down.
Eddie: (Nods)
I'd give this book a cookie
Yesterday the 59-year-old was found guilty of conspiracy to engage in sexual activity with children under the age of 16 as well as two counts of rape, aiding and abetting a rape, one count of sexual assault and an allegation of trafficking for sexual exploitation.
a t-shirt to sleep in, watch the news,
Music. . . On A Day Like This, David Bridie
Farm credit calls for innovative ways to reach people still out of the umbrella of institutional credit. The report says that while the overall credit to agriculture has been growing phenomenally during the last few years, and the interest rates for farmers have also been reduced to 7 percent (4 percent after taking into account the 3 percent interest subvention for timely repayment of crop loans), yet the biggest challenge remains in terms of increasing access to credit, particularly for the bottom 40 percent. More innovative models are needed to reach this category as they rely largely on the informal sector for credit with high rates of interest.
(I buy all of my cleaning products at Target or Bed Bath and Beyond, great if you are always getting coupons in the mail for BB&B like I am ha!)
She pains
I have this nagging feeling that there is still something wrong with the picture - and I can't pinpoint what. I know some areas that I could have done better technically - but that isn't it. If you have any ideas, I'd be interested to hear. Or maybe I've just beaten myself over the head with this picture for too long.
An overheated Industrial expansion, an arrogant financial class that overextended in an effort to catch the Brass Ring, and a clueless Governing Class that made a huge, strategic mistake at precisely the wrong time - all contributed to what was perhaps the worst global economic crisis in history.
This makes me smile...)
formed. As I stood there taking the picture a freezing cold, fog-like
Class I Feasts: Only 1 Collect (except Dawn Mass of Christmas)
When Chance runs into Stephanie on the street, he realizes that he found his woman. The problem is she’s a human. Not a problem for him though. Now all he has to do is convince her that they are meant to be together forever; talk the ever-meddling pack council into allowing the mating; and protect his pack from a group of rogue wolves wreaking havoc across the state. With their hearts, and lives, on the line Chance and Stephanie will do the only thing they can…
“The path to avert default now runs through the House of Representatives,” Mr. Reid said after Democrats voted against the House plan. He said that he was canceling plans to keep the Senate in session over the weekend and that lawmakers would instead reconvene Monday, just more than a week before the Aug. 2 deadline set by the Treasury Department for increasing the $14.3 trillion limit.
"Yes," replied their father, his tone resolute. He straightened his back and held out his arms. "Just stay with me. Sam, put that arrow away."
There, death is part of life.
And the first gorgeous home featured is that of Rachel Ashwell
The Upsetters - Ring Of Fire
On a three-day pass, with my grandmother, he made my mother. A good thing, too, because he promptly caught a severe case of measles in the service. No more babies would be possible after that.
Tights: Calzedonia
For we would have to run to safety,
I like Susan started off at a market without knowing the regulations...but my lovely TS man came to see me very soon after to put me right...and he's been keeping an eye on me once a year, every year since 1999!
I must say, I have missed the excuse to be creepy and take pictures of everything I eat and make...I also miss the excuse to try to come up with the most outlandish kind of dishes in the hopes that maybe, just maybe they will be successful.
This baby Edwin so cute.........
and then this,
I mean, I wear the shoulder part of my seat belt because of Dr. G. I’ve had my belief that you shouldn’t take everyone at face value confirmed by Dr. G. I know what a Y-incision is because of Dr. G. And I can’t help, but think that the Y-incision is a sign…
Have a great Sunday and a bright new week.
Earthquake insurance is the kind of thing that it is easy to convince yourself you don’t need… until you do. Then, it’s too late.
I really hope the authors come up with an App for the next 200 words, and possible some that encourage children to explore the Queensland Beginners’ script, such as tracing letters.
So anyway, yeah. Old Gods suck.
Then be sure to pop over and read the other MEMEs on the linky – let’s celebrate our elderly loved ones!
(*Note: While I do contribute interior design posts to other aforementioned industry entities, my trip to the High Point Market was sponsored by moi, so no favors are being called upon for my own blog.)
on telly. I try not to say a thing
There was grace and mystery in her attitude as if she were a symbol of something. He asked himself what is a woman standing on the stairs in the shadow, listening to distant music, a symbol of. If he were a painter he would paint her in that attitude. Her blue felt hat would show off the bronze of her hair against the darkness and the dark panels of her skirt would show off the light ones. Distant Music he would call the picture if he were a painter.Gabriel is the central character in this story, and for most of it he's self-important and self-conscious, unable to connect deeply with other people and step into their shoes. The scene I've just described takes place at the end of a long dinner and music party at his aunts' house. Earlier he gave a speech at their table, a task he took to with relish, nervousness and condescension. Gabriel likes to be at the head of a table, particularly if everyone recognizes that he belongs there, carving the roast and bestowing wit and eloquence on the less cultured guests.
This picture was taken during a play performed at the Youth For Peace rally. It was a great new take on the Nativity performed by some very talented young Dominicans.
When I traveled into Southern Sudan, you could sense something was different there. There is a greedy spirit there that you can feel. Foreign aid had ruined South Sudan. People do not want to work, they want handouts. An entire generation has been cared for by the UN and other NGO’s. They are fed, clothed, protected, and sent to school without having to do anything. I walked through the market there and saw UNICEF tarps and blankets for sale. I could also buy Samaritan’s Purse shoe-boxes, filled with all sorts of American goodies. I thought back how I thought it was a good idea for me to send a shoebox filled with soap, toothpaste, bouncy balls, and a washcloth to a faraway land. What I realize now is that sending things, whether money, objects, or people to a place that I have no information on is a bad idea.
"During the last four years, the sales of the drug by the Patentee at a price of about Rs 2.8 lakhs (for a therapy of one month) constitute a fraction of the requirement of the public. It stands to common logic that a patented article like the drug in this case was not brought by the public due to only one reason, i.e. its price was not reasonably affordable to them."
anything to visit her twin brother in jail along with other Colonial rebel soldiers to bring him food and supplies, even deliver messages for Jeremiah even though her family’s religion does not believe in supporting the soldiers. As Jeremiah and Hannah learn more about each other’s’ convictions they also learn
Telling the true story of axe murders that rocked New Orleans at the turn of the twentieth century, The Terrible Axe-Man of New Orleans hits all the classic Geary highlights. A true, unsolved crime, meticulous research, and the spare yet compelling drawings that both make the people almost real and draw you right into the story no matter the time or place.
P.S. This is a 12 x 12 too!
‘Til next time!!
Anyway, I've come up with my own idea for an ad, if I were to do one.
Worn out by the sharp struggle, fast asleep.
The day our Lord spoke to me. It wasn’t just a day, but it was more like a lifetime.
The academic wizards of the New Ways have discovered the means to draw power out of their own bodies and are no longer able to draw magic from the earth as was done in the old days. But the magi of the Heteronomy still valued the more difficult-to-access, but likewise more powerful magic protected by the Dozen Tribes of the Black Forest, who jealously guarded their nearly-forgotten ways. It was the southern wizards’ lust for this knowledge that brought bloody ruin upon the Black Forest.
This is something that doesn’t appeal to everyone, but it’s something that everyone should do at least once. It’s the most fun thing you can do in the dessert (or beach dunes), I can’t even describe how awesome it is. Race around the dunes, jump off them, park on the highest one and watch the sun set…
There's still a little bit of time to enter the Shabby Apple Giveaway! Just click on the image at the top of the right hand side bar for details.
First I cut all of the pieces needed to create my hedgehog for Olivia's wall. I used my blade on 3 and my pressure on 3. When I finished cutting all the pieces the first thing I did was remove the excess vinyl leaving only the image I am going to put on the wall.
T.Y. “Don’t Call Me Paris” Hilton is a smaller school player who was recruited by some larger schools, such as Florida, but chose to stay in his hometown of Miami and play for the Panthers. Hilton was named Sun Belt Freshman of the Year, first-team all-conference as a returner and all-purpose player, and Freshman All-American as a return specialist by multiple organizations after a strong first season at FIU (41-1,013-7 receiving, 14-43-2 rushing, 36-843-1 kick returns, 18-266-1 punt returns). He was bothered by nagging injuries as a sophomore but still led the team in receiving (57-632-5) and kickoff returns (22-633-1), then returned to form strong enough to be named Sun Belt Player of the Year for his play in 2010 (59-848-5 rec, 30-282-4 rush, 29-833-2 KR, 20-126 PR), helping FIU win its first Sun Belt title. Hilton will be available anywhere between the 4th and 6th rounds.
Up to 60 separate bomb attacks left 81 people dead and 456 injured. Many took place in Shi’ah locations, with attacks recorded in all four of the major Shi’ah holy areas (including Kadhimiyah, Karbala, Najaf and Samarra) over the past week.
Row 27- ch1, turn, sc in 8sc, fpdc, sk open sc, (sc in 12, fpdc, sk open sc) 5times, sc in last 9. Do not join.
I’m currently studying for an 8AM exam and I’m not happy about it. I’M TIRED OF STUDYING. I’M TIRED OF FLASH CARDS. I’M TIRED OF READING TEXT BOOKS. I’M TIRED OF GOING TO CLASS AND HAVING BORING PROFESSORS. I’M TIRED OF FRESHMEN. I HATE YOU ASHER. I LOVED YOU FRESHMAN YEAR WHEN I HAD NOTHING TO DO BUT PARTY, BUT NOW, AS A SENIOR WHO IS TRYING TO GRADUATE, I HATE YOU.
The Passat mid-2012 following the convention segment with front-wheel drive and all-independent suspension. Go, however, is a reflex sporty premium-class and serenity which proves that his predecessor was German to the bone. America is rooted in giving greater confidence handling Passatss 2012 but did not pull and trip, according to control.
That is also a lie. You may be right about 60% of the public, but not most scientist. At least, not the scientists whose field of study is at all relevant, like say climatologists.
tales of all time – The Protocols of the Learned Elders of Zion. This
The two heroes of the movie are names Burt and Ernie, seemingly referencing the popular Sesame Street characters, but writer/ director Dan O'Bannon claims he wasn't aware of the characters at the time and says it was all a big coincidence.
The home was plain and simple. Adobe-style mud bricks supported by lumber hewed from the nearby forest. Inside was roomy but spartan, dark and cool. The two or three rooms inside are for living, sleeping and such. The other spaces i.e. the bathroom and the kitchen, were outside.
I’ve been writing since elementary school – my first present to my teacher was a book I wrote and illustrated (still have a copy) – so why stop now? Pick up a book and it’s like diving under water to explore another world. Are movies easier entertainment, sure, I would have to say sometimes I don’t feel like reading another. single. word. because that’s all I do allll day.
Yep, that’s it. Tiny reddish new leaves in the center of the leaf axial. Perhaps it’s just the time of year for new growth or maybe it was fresh soil and a new pot. What ever it is, I’m very happy!
You barely talk that first time, though you quickly acknowledge he does indeed have great hair. A few months later, you go to see him play and you're bowled over by the power of his voice, the strength of his lyrics. You wake up the next morning singing a song you've only heard a couple of times that already seems implanted in your brain.
Well the physical thing, the running, throwing bit is easily and uncontroversial answered. Simple, people of African descent (especially the Jamaicans) are genetically better equipped in this regard. Their muscle fibres are different and the typically have 15% more free testosterone than other peoples. Acknowledging this is regarded as racism. Unfortunately, racist or not, that is proven and a fact. Google it and you will find that for over 70 years, in test after test, done by dozens of university professors and Nobel laureates plus USA government studies, most people of African descent trail other races by a wide margin.
Generic Solos
3) I am wearing ridiculous heels and can barely walk as it is
Mercy was nodding vigorously at my side, and my imagination quickly conjured up a picture of Mercy trying to walk into their bedroom and being butted by Liberty who was crawling around the room on her hands and knees with clothing hanging out of her mouth. I smothered my laughter and tried to find a good solution.
And now my nominees! (I apologise if any of you have already received it)
Sam and Abby let go at the same time and Will fell to the floor with a grunt. But he smiled as he picked himself up. "Thank you, my misses. It is much appreciated."
(Moses supposes his toeses are roses)
Al may have spent far too much time alone in the house he inherited from his famous great grandfather, a noted Egyptologist. In his loneliness he has found companions in the hundreds of objects and a few plants that fill the cavernous home. The house has become a veritable museum of valuable and rare antiquities and treasures of the pharaohs. When Al's finances are in danger of plummeting to the poverty level he helps himself to one or two of those treasures, takes a trip to Mahir Suleyman's junk/resale shop where they haggle over a price, and Al leaves with a chunk of change in his pockets. Life is easy - chats with Eulalia, a few gossipy whispers from the philodendrons, selling an ushabti or statuette of Bast every now and then. Then Norbie drops in unexpectedly for a visit.
It's huge and it's less than ten years old, on ten acres of which we can use every little bit.
13-15
Waistin’ away just passin’ time
Here are the sketches for the mask that I have done so far. I used some pictures on the web as a reference (because I am not awesome at drawing)
I reattempt a recipe that I had done many years ago, a hot favourite with my family.
Now.... imagine a plain, boring ole clipboard. Now take that, add some animal print paper, mod podge, ribbon and stickers and VOILA! You have a ridiculously adorable clipboard. :) I really want to be better about going around and taking notes on my kids while they are working, so I decided to motivate myself with a decorated clipboard. It was my first time using mod podge, but I think it turned out great!
Isn't there -- isn't that what the Federal Circuit was trying to explain, which is that there has to be something more substantive than the mere exchange of information; that it has to involve -- it used the word "transformation." It hasn't defined the outer limits of what it means by that.
Love your husband
Round the squares huddled in storms
My son's friends happen to eat quite a lot
God doesn't expect us to be perfect. He knows that is not possible for us. He wants us to love Him and obey Him.
Contrary to popular misconception, it was originally reported as apocrypha, as the author of the article it was first aired within couldn't confirm (or deny, apparently) its authenticity. From a special UFO issue of Saga magazine in 1972:
Full Sail Doppelbock, 2008. Just a hair past its prime, with a stewing that goes a bit flaccid in the middle.
And what an early one for me it is.
On October 7th, we are presenting five contributing writers and a visual artist at the nationally recognized Seward House Museum in Auburn, NY. Sheila Applegate, Cyd Charisse Fulton, Christine Green, Tamara J. Madison and Sean O'Grady will read work published in aaduna as well as other selections. Christofe Chabot will present "Not Altered Images" a video/slide show presentation that he compiled and orchestrated the music for. This work is a composite look at the images presented in the galleries over the course of the three 2011 issues and will complement "Altered Images" an exhibition of 15 images. Cristofe's work "Saikotic'' can be viewed in the Kuta Gallery in the current issue.
The substance was there, even if the critics chose to ignore it. Their debut single, "Holy Joe," caught on enough to get them into the lower reaches of the charts; their sophomore effort, "John Wayne Is Big Leggy," broke them big. Using a story of The Duke taking liberties with a squaw as an allegory for the treatment of Native Americans by European settlers, it was mildly controversial. But damn if it wasn't catchy! The single went to #11 and got them national exposure throughout the UK.
This morning I was feeling generous (and selfish), so I decided that I would go the extra mile. Instead of choosing to only making a chocolate cake (which I knew would please the boys), I also made something I knew I would enjoy, too. That something ended up being a mixed berry upside-down cake.
The last few releases have been criticised quite heavily for the lack of carbonation, which is justified to a degree but I don't think it completely ruins the beer like many people seem to suggest. It's a big complex beer and well worth getting hold of.
Fetzer Winery Food Pairing Recommendations:
Old-timers (and the voluble Guardian Angels founder Curtis Sliwa) portray a rougher Brooklyn: corrupt street cops, race battles at schools, and even the struggle to get a free table at Lundy’s.
“Shit on a brick stick.” She griped. Looking at Piper and Nixon, she barked, “Well, what the fuck are you two doing standing around gawking? Get those crates to the surface!”
So, after the movie, I herd into the Ladies' Room with a bunch of other movie-goers while the rest of my posse waits in the hall. I go in, find an "acceptable" stall, and do my business. I also happen to be wearing a bracelet containing several charms on it. Picture this...
Ynet Published: 02.29.12
Flaming Lips She does not use jelly UK
Josefina Vidal. Let me read the statement that they gave us. “We
1 tsp vanilla flavoring
Cecil was such a good coach to is wife, helping massage her lower back through each contraction all night!
Bloody Cornwall,
Every prayer a powerful weapon
This week I'm grateful for:
The book has a foreword specially written by variety entertainers Ian and Janette Krankie.
Mike Terry, Deseret News
Many brands have been using Pinterest to attract traffic to visit their sites. It has become a cheaper and easier form of advertising. Instead of spending an advertising budget on sidebar ads or click-through advertising, many companies, especially those featuring CPG’s, have found a more efficient way to drive traffic to their sites.
Please hit our roof...hard. Everywhere. Lots of you guys.
Even if my yearbook did not help me, or made me look unprofessional, I still believe I made the right choice.
I don’t even know half of the supporting characters’ names, but that’s hardly their greatest problem. At best, they’re additional faces to fill the screen and pass the time while Larry flips burgers. At worst, they’re incredibly irritating. The subplot involving the attractive young college student, Talia (Gugu Mbatha-Raw), is, as I say, an odd one. Talia serves as the obligatory “free spirit” offering sage advice about love, life, and not-tucking-in-your-shirt (the perfect example of the annoying cliché ridden supporting cast); only George Takei (of Star Trek fame) manages to raise a smile.
VERDICT: There is a good reason why Bobby Flay is a Food Network Iron Chef. He has the gift of adding a variety of ingredients to create a symphony of flavor. My taste buds worked overtime to process the zing of the pomegranate molasses, the sweet of the vanilla bean butter, the crunch of the pecans and the sweet-tart "pop of the pomegranate arils. I truly loved this dish. Contrary to some reviewers who said this dish was too sweet-- I say that they took shortcuts that cheated them out of what Bobby Flay meant for this dish to be. It's colorful. It's flavorful. It's downright sexy. I will make this for Christmas Eve dinner, for certain. Brussels sprouts, you have arrived in my love life!
A meeting of the chief creditors of Pattison's (Ltd.) was held on Wednesday, says an Edinburgh correspondent, when it was agreed to accede to the request of the directors to hold over bills now due for ten days. The meeting appointed an Edinburgh accountant to represent them in making up a statement of the firm's affairs. The panic has now almost subsided. A more hopeful view is now taken on the Exchange. From a well-informed source I learn that the £10 Preference Shares will this week see £5. The Company have agreed to the appointment of Mr. Chiene, chartered accountant, Edinburgh, to prepare an exhaustive report on tho position of the business, and the banks having meantime agreed to advance the necessary funds to keep things the business is being conducted as usual. It is stated that the assets, after meeting the liabilities, would leave a margin of £150,000. A Glasgow correspondent learns upon inquiry that none of the Scotch banks am involved to the extent of a single penny without adequate security, and that a circular to be issued will substantiate the company's claim to be able to pay 20s. in the pound."
As long as the Nets are allowing Jay-Z to call their marketing shots — what a shock that he chose black and white as the new team colors to stress, as the Nets explained, their new “urban” home — why not have him apply the full Jay-Z treatment?
still writing for pov
USA and 18 and older can enter daily and the winner
In a season now dedicated to conspicuous consumption and self-indulgence, it is almmost a crime to be poor. It is not good marketing therefore to put traditional images to the fore and to bring to customers` minds the uncomfortable idea of poverty.
4. Hank is a closet eater. Those blood cookies were the size of his head! He was eating one for dinner and breakfast – besides the obsession potion, watch out for a heart attack.
but this one is moving randomly -
It is not only in youth that one has to deal with such growth. Every transition in life leads to a new coming of age, and the death of a mate is probably the greatest of these events. Death is undoable. Irrevocable. By middle age or late middle age, we have all lost people who are dear to us, but losing a mate is different because not only is the person gone, so is the life you shared and the plans you made. Adding to the difficulty, everything you do, everything you eat, everything you see is a reminder that he is gone. Forever. That is a bit of innocence that can never be recouped. A bit of hurt that can never be repaired. A true coming of age that makes one’s adolescent transition seem trivial by comparison.
My hands are shaking with nerves as I radio in my first suspicious activity to command.
It didn’t work out. Oh well. Live and learn.
CONTACT INFORMATION:
A Great attitude magically connects us to all sorts of serendipitous opportunities. This is a great quote by Earl Nightingale. Each morning when I wake up the first think I do is welcome the day. I thank God for my very existence. My attitude is surrounded with thoughts of the previous day and sometimes it is difficult to remove them. When I think about attitude I wonder how people can be angry everyday it is so exhausting. Attitude is important in how we meet the challenges of the day.
Past Programs Now Available for Viewing:
the plants are dying and the next
"Just a silly game!"
Does anyone have a theory about why I would be unable to concentrate now? I’m tempted to call the psychiatrist and ask about it and/or make an appointment to talk about it, but calling to make an appointment earlier than my scheduled one makes me feel guilty for some reason. Besides, it’s probably not a big deal.
- sea salt to taste
I am the swift uplifting rush of quiet birds in circled flight.
I wonder what's planned for the next thirty years.
No. A nice young man showed us to a roomy trailer with a refrigerator and a stove. We got the kids into bed, drank one large, very cold Morretti apiece, then Anette crawled under the covers, too. The campground seemed peaceful but strangely empty. It was a beautiful, cool summer night. I took a walk...and a hundred meters down a paved path, I stumbled into the Mediterranean.
So without further ado, here's my new Blogging Schedule!
AS I read about the the history and interesting places to visit while I'm there, I couldn't help but think about the beer of Germany. And that I was going to be there during Oktoberfest, but not able to attend. Then I remembered those 2 bottles of Flying Dog I had stashed in the fridge. I couldn't help it. I had to have one.
Because it's time to change.
Ta ta! :)
And let me just tell you….IT FEELS SOOOOOO AMAZING…..afterwards. Hahaha
Be alert NOW in Texas, Oklahoma, Kansas,and Missouri — these cells are either over you currently, or will be very shortly (1030pm CDT 4/30/2012 now).
all the nations that forget God.
How fun are these for a wedding favour? Wonderfully old fashioned style tickets.
“If all that I was interested in was money, the easiest decision would have been to stay at Arsenal, picking up my money every week and walking into the team.
Meanwhile, oblivious to the scandal, Najib has already moved onto to his next ‘image’ – he is now trying to be ‘Mr Cool’. Malaysians have already received a taste of this revamped image, with Najib spouting words like ‘awesome’, ‘cool’ and inviting youths to his official residence to watch the recent football finals.
how heavy the aftermath of silence.
This particular article focuses on the marketing of vaccines--especially the "flu vaccines" that are being pushed so hard at this time of the year. Everywhere you turn, the media is telling us that we must get ourselves and our children vaccinated against any and every disease that might or might not be lurking out there just waiting to jump on us and attack. I can't tell you the number of commercials on television and on the radio that I've heard over the last few months telling us where to go and what to get.
I also must note cos I thought it was so cute, my daughter(R) said "I really wanted to smile Mummy, but there were just so many people"
In 1513 Michelangelo won a competition to complete the facade of the Basilica of San Lorenzo in Florence, which was left unfinished by Brunelleschi.
Wish you a beautiful day, wherever you are
It’s a marathon gamut. For next time, send us more of your questions.
It’s a weird thing that although most editors in the UK are happy to accept texts divided into spreads, this isn’t the case in the US. I’ve never understood that. With spreads, I find it easier to visualise not just my own text, but also other texts by other writers. Perhaps some editors feel the writer is stepping on the toes of the designer and illustrator? After all, we’re not allowed to give illustration notes unless something vital can’t be interpreted from the text alone. And then there is the strange exception to all this: educational publishing. If we write reading scheme books (eg Oxford Reading Tree) then we’re supposed to give detailed illustration notes for each page. The first time I did this I felt naughty, as though I was doing something
So I haven't been sleeping as much as I need to. Thus the Beastie Boys, shout-singing with me:
On a side note, if you find yourself ordering a bottled coopers beer at a pub/bar in Australia which serves coopers traditional beers , The bar staff might start rolling the bottle from side to side along the bar to get the sediment distributed throughout the beer before serving.
of row. Yes, bpdc around the chains at the very end of the row. Cut ribbing
O you who believe! Shall I guide you to a commerce that will save you from a painful torment? (V.61: 10)
Dispersed amongst all this frivolity are the two detectives Michael (Mosquito Squadron) Anthony as Lieutenant De Vivo, and none other than Harold Sylvester as Jim Bunch in his first film ever! Harold had major parts in TV shows like "Walking Tall," "Shaky Ground," and in one of my all-time favourites, "Married With Children," he had the role of Griff!
There is even some wild conjecture that Najib is contemplating going overseas on self-exile. But this is ridiculous since at the moment he is free to go anywhere in the world. Just resign and go. Nobody would stop him and he can go wherever he likes.
So, how can you win?
JUST FOR FUN!!
Finally a reborn múm, proofing why they are so popular in Belgium.
I don't know about you, but any time I hear those words a song pops into my head.
1) Up to 4 Hens
Hugs and Smooches,
No, I would be a bad sport if I gave away where it guides you to, but trust me, he knows what he is doing.
Want to join us? Ladies, maybe you skip shaving your legs until you reach your goal weight. Guys, you can do the face thing with us! Email your “BEFORE” pictures and a brief message about yourself to MOUG@KLUC.com!
WHOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOSHHHHHHH!!!!
‘Ha, ha - they're all gonna die’
“Oh, you may not think I’m pretty,
Recommended:
I wear “Pocahontas Samincha ” Earrings almost everyday. They stones are gorgeous and I feel pretty in them and oh so blessed. I Love the contrast between the very shining Swarovski crystals and the matte of the genuine corals and seed beads. I like how the crystals shine and you can see the red of the coral through my shoulder length light brown with blondish highlights hair.
By 1 p.m. ET, the top bid had reached $2,550.
“Relax,” I said. “It’s just homeroom.”
Oh yeah!
Students in JOMC 457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the 13th of those posts. Ashley Russell is a junior at UNC-Chapel Hill who is majoring in editing and graphic design. She hopes to become a book editor when she graduates in the spring of 2013.
For those of you who feel the urge to say you have little kids that mess it up, just let it be. Shut it.
Roshan and Chelsie danced a Viennese Waltz. After a difficult rehearsal, he got it and was graceful and elegant. Carrie Ann said of the men, he was the best dancer. Roshan said he just wanted to hear three words from Len and did when Len said, "Good job, Dawg." He was thrilled that Carrie Ann called him a man. Score - 26.
100% of royalties from the sale of Secrets of Voice-Over Success are donated to the Alzheimer’s Association.
Overall, if you’re looking for a film with action, tension, suspense, clever plot line and a romantic subplot, this would be the perfect film to watch. Definitely a good movie to see with someone you love or just for the pure sake of it. Entrapment gives us a dose of its mesmerizing poison and watches us sink into our seats without any leniency. Exotic locations and two charming characters that let you into their world, but can we truly trust them? You be the judge.
On February 21st, Steve Milloy of JunkScience.com, was published in The Washington Times in an opinion about EPA Administrator Lisa Jackson’s testimony before Congress writing that “Over the past three years, the Obama EPA has conducted a scorched earth campaign against fossil fuel producers and users, especially the coal-fired power industry, with multibillion-dollar rules that provide no meaningful environmental or public health benefits.”
Now, on with the show: Katy has had a life and loved and made two children. Along the way she also became an Australian and hooked up with Barry Crocker. Katy's looking her age in the later photo which adorns the Wikipedia article about her but the delightful young woman is still there...it's just the travelling machine that's suffered some damage. Katy also injured her prospects of appearing in BBC children's television. As follows:
This is the eight (8th!!!) looks:book I have produced. I started two years ago, crazy how time flies. Each time I complete a looks:book I have the same two desires: 1. to sleep for like a week (whew! It's a lot of work! I pour everything I've got into these babies!) and 2. to spend every penny I own on this seasons hottest trends and pieces! So I am properly exhausted and inspired which means one thing: a job well done. No?
Today is Sketch Challenge 350....
Khirad: It was an accident. He dropped fluid on me. He was trying to help me. Actually it was a big scheme devised by your mother to make you think I am a slut...and it worked
Watch for cougar tracks and signs. Cougars cover unconsumed portions of their kills with soil and leaf litter. Avoid these food caches.
I’ve always liked tuna. I didn’t say loved, just liked. It’s not something that I eat very often at all, but I like tuna salad sandwiches. Tuna comes in these little tin cans, and I always imagined the fish to be about the size of red snapper or salmon. Imagine my surprise when I saw them catch the first tuna and it was around 500 pounds! It was ENORMOUS! I had NO IDEA that tuna were so giant! And the guys on the boat were rejoicing since that one tuna would fetch them around $5000! Who knew?!
Double damn his rational thinking.
The 40 states that fell short of making all three goals in the 2008-09 school year were not required to report on which ones they failed to meet.
2) avoid unpacking moving boxes
he needs a little crack of the whip
Begin the nice person that I am, I told her that I could take her in early Tuesday afternoon (I always show up an hour prior to practice, anyway), and we could go out out the parking lot so she could learn the movements.
This week its not quite so easy...
Before I get into all the different things that could mean, I should explain who Chen Guangcheng is. As the Wall Street Journal reports, he’s a lawyer and activist who has been working against many of China’s more questionable human rights practices.
The Arabic word used here is ‘naas’ – people; which is plural and does not refer to individuals.
- I’ve had Twitter for 5 days
-Brent
05 Looking For Someone (Nightride, 22 February 1970)
Total: 20 Minutes
How can this be? Many exclaim. It’s easy. The election for President that takes place the first Tuesday in November is not a national election but it is fifty separate elections. Our founding fathers set it up this way so that larger population centers would not dictate who our President would be.
-0.203705 , 100.319872
Cost so far: 34 gold
You are ALL Master Creator Chela/Cohan in your journey. NONE are of different, just in different times and lessons/stages. Please love thineselves you ARE your temple to your INNER purity and perfect harmonic balance that you were created in, by your Creator in perfect unconditional love. Within your “Temple” holds ALL KEYS and ALL ANSWERS to your soul journey path that you have chosen in this life and times. This is why often is said to you “look within, all things are there” you carry creator in PURE in WHOLE within your soul at ALL times and ALL ways. There is also a saying I like to say “CHANGE THOUGHT, CHANGE ALOT!”
I honor the architect for his/her vision.
"No, but David touched its twin."
B's birthday was yesterday I was with her all day she was good and had a really nice birthday. Her party was last Saturday it was fun but I hardly knew anyone so that made it a little weird. We are working on potty training and it is not going so hot. It makes me sad since I am the one dealing with the messes but hey that is what it is.
The screen then spits into three and we see Myra Langtry (Annette Benning) park her car and head for a jewelry and watch repair store. Each of them wear sunglasses, and all three turn towards the camera at the same time as if somebody called them.
They even go as far as using graded exercise, which is torture treatment for patients with ME and CFS, and thousands of us have had major relapses and become Bedbound and completely dependent on others, including myself and many other severely affected ME patients, thanks to these psychiatrists and their so-called treatments.
"Mrs. Cowper, are you well?"
Never thought I’d be able to say,
I found this sketch in an old Magnolia magazine and immediately thought of the opportunity to use my SU Established Elegance set. It was fun to stamp the different objects in the circle. I started with a stamped off twice image from SU Elements of Style in Crumb Cake ink. The crown is stamped with Crumb Cake, the dress form stamped twice in Soft Suede and the wording and flowers are stamped with Not Quite Navy. I have sponged around the edges with NQN as well. The dress form has been cut out and raised with Dimensionals.
for the vein, Quick!
This really is a very powerful, strange and beautiful book! I absolutely adored Bleeding Violet, it's zany and quirky, but very poignant and touching. Such a great ending! You have to read this book!
Supper: 3 lettuce tacos with extra lettuce and even less meat than before, and half of an avocado. I probably ate close to a quarter of a head of lettuce tonight. I put 2 teaspoons of sour cream on my tacos for those of you that are worried about my dairy intake.
I meant to write about what he said, and I find myself instead setting down words about feeling. I am talking about his talk and yet the language I am using mostly fails to address its content, describing instead the sensations it delivered.
2) Don't drive your father's 'rig'. They tend to think you are a hooligan who stole it.
When it came to provincial departments, the Northern Cape had the highest number of employees with criminal records (23), followed by the Free State with 16 and the Western Cape with 10.
If this has ever happened to you, don’t worry – you aren’t alone! Thankfully, we have a multitude of wonderful resources in our LCNV library to help you target what the problem might be and great strategies to avoid it happening again in the future. One of these resources is the Vocabulary Teaching Handbook by Jayme Adelson-Goldstein. Published in tandem with the Oxford Picture Dictionary series, the Vocabulary Teaching Handbook is a 40 page resource meant for teachers just like you – working with adult ESOL learners.
On a damp morning in Reykjavík, a hungover Olafur Arnalds is reflecting on one of the many upsides of life as a musician in Iceland. "It's easy to sell a lot of CDs here," he says, "because we all know each other and you don't want to steal from your friends. I've never downloaded an Icelandic album illegally – it wouldn't cross your mind."
Among the other growth at the Lion Brewery, its offices have moved to Laird Street in Wilkes-Barre.
1. Omega Mortis
It matters in America, where the self-appointed elite let a tame black man into the White House. Their antidote for this empty suit is Mitt Romney. It matters in the UK, where a Prime Minister who has lied to Parliament on several occasions now tries to defend a slimey careerist on grounds so illogically ridiculous, the media barely know where to start in deconstructing it. It matters in France, where (having torpedoed one opponent) the Sarkozyistes are now busily engaging the services of bankers and Germans to demonise the new challenger. (They needn’t worry: Hollande is not exactly a game-changer in my book). And it matters in Australia, where the truly appalling Labour Stateist Julia Gillard came to power and stays there on the basis of a grubby agreement with mining conglomerates.
Mixing up the segments of our sets is proving to be crowd pleasing. We have about 4-5 distinct musical components now.
Sep-11 Pittsburgh, PA CONSOL Energy Center On Sale Soon
Further, in light of the Dutch Heineken decision, trade mark owners may want to consider contractual arrangements to look for an angle to pursue SCPs which supply infringing third parties with services in the future, although trade mark rights will still be enforceable against the customers of those SCPs, which should ensure that infringing goods can be prevented from reaching the market.
Whose complaining about two weeks of 70 and 80 degree weather in the middle of a Michigan March when our average highs are traditionally only 42? Not I. The brave daffodils are in bloom three weeks early, we are in a hurry, nature and me.
Take enough clothes for about a week or so and plan on doing laundry about once a week. If you're going to be gone less than a week, you won't have to worry about doing laundry at all.
Chris Sports SM City North EDSA (Ground Floor)
On this day in 1996, I was (finally) Bride at my own wedding.
These artistic shots taken in color and black and white are sure to capture the best of a quite moment between the two of you. All you need is a chaise lounge and a romantic spirit (which I am sure will be in full supply).
In the RB6′s case Newey made an opening in the diffuser to allow the diffuser to be blown both under and over by the exhaust. This probably helps the airflow going up the outside shoulder of the upper diffuser deck, which probably has little energy and struggles to keep attached. Other teams this weekend may be expected to run a diffuser blown over the top, which perhaps offers less potential then a through blown diffuser, but at least will be legal next year when double diffuser are by banned by new rules preventing openings in the diffuser.
As opposed to putting in limitless entry orders and changing the entry points every time a new high is established, and all that stuff, I’ve decided to use the following as guidelines for my trading. I say “guidelines” because I simply will not always be able to check in exactly 24 hours after my last trade. And in some cases I may just decide that there’s enough profit there at the moment to take it, particularly if I know I’ll be gone during my normal “check-in” time. But for the most part, I’ll try to stick to the rules as much as I can.
If you are going to stamp a design, do it now before folding your box together. I folded the box base underneath the area I was stamping so I had a plain white base. You could also mask the base.
enthusiasm is obvious but not overbearing in the recording. if not for the speed problems
Vinyl for 8x8 block- $8.00
"What!" my mom said as she entered my room.
Why would they? If the arts are a sophisticated form of communication, is our advocacy sometimes like trying to sell an incomprehensible product in a foreign language? Will incentives make it much easier, I wonder? Unless folks already ‘get’ the value on display, putting incentives on something will have only predictable results. Would offering discounts on hamburgers matter to a vegetarian? Would a ‘buy one get one free’ clearance sale on NASA space suits entice a family struggling to get by? Would a free set of encyclopedias help sell farming equipment to an underwater salvage company? You can’t sell a thing if what you are peddling is either unremarkable, inscrutable, valueless, or offensive to potential buyers. Incentives only make a difference if the product already sparks an interest, and the question is whether the Arts have missed the chance of appealing to folks that grew up without them.
It takes its own shape, so you dont have to hem anything!
The woods' margins are a charm of thrushsong, goldfinch, bullfinch. A single yellowhammer flips over the hedge.
At the risk of sounding repetitive, I went to the Seattle Boat Show again this year on Wednesday. As usual, the show is held at the Century Link Event Center(aka "The Clink") and the in-the-water portion was held at the south end of Lake Union at Chandlers Cove. I only went to the Clink. There were boats at Chandlers Cove that I wanted to look at and the at Clink were all the vendors for the "stuff" that I wanted to look at.
3. Discuss with your students that this is about process as much as the end result. The magic of the Rube is the myriad opportunities it provides for problem solving! Be sure to show them the Mythbusters Christmas special, which shows not only their Rube Goldberg project, but provides a delightful insight to how many times things go wrong in a project like this, even for professionals.
2 1/2 tbsp brown sugar
After my breakdown I wanted to be a mime. Desperately. My mother, who of anyone was amused by me, began to support what she'd call my "avant-garde" tastes, thought this was hilarious, maybe wonderful. I had gone to Paris my junior year, my first time in Europe (second time on a plane?) with the girl who is now dead, and saw the mimes outside of Sacre Couer, and they were the only spectacles that could lighten my mood. I came home and was obsessed with training to be a mime. I never took a course, obviously. Although when I co-curated that experimental week I did get Northwestern's troupe of mimes to perform, and my parents came, they were so cute, my father wore a tie, in that gritty grungy shack, I remember that very affectionately.
33. Bikram.
Location: East Lansing, MI
Keynote Speakers and Panels:
I suppose I could start a pile elsewhere...
Thank Christ For The Bomb (1970)
-We also had a failed Walmart adventure in Quincy (pro tip: not every Walmart has a grocery store), but that meant I got to kind of see the area a little. I was pretty amused that Quincy had signs up featuring John and Abigail Adams, but not John Quincy. Also, we saw a sign for "Joseph McCarthy Air Conditioning." Opening a window is for communists.
I've probably made more martinis than any other cocktail. I've surely drank more of them than any other cocktail. But when it comes to mixology, Paris is much more mojito than martini. So I was pleasantly surprised to see them taught side by side at a recent cocktail class I was scoping out. l'Art France is one of a handful of Paris cooking schools getting onboard with the cocktail trend. I enlisted the company of friend and fellow drinker from my old local, Marette, and off we went for some shaker-schooling.
The opening Mithras with its beckoning muscular bass and smiling keys draws one into the album immediately, the seventies progressive guitar and keys forming a groove that lies easily with the dark rasping out of place but firmly linked vocals. The track shimmers and glistens within the ear whilst its darkened pulse and dissident energy prowls behind. This is followed by the excellent drone grooved Ahriman. The song wraps the senses with a wash of warm melodies, Southern rock stoner tones, and infectious guitar manipulations. The track is a heated atmosphere of light though again with a watching dark presence and with a lightened drone quality that is fully hypnotic. The two opening songs are for want of a better term, traditionally structured songs which engage with a captivation and out stretched hand.
This passage from Joshua 10, tells us very plainly that the Amorite’s had fallen under the condemnation and judgment of God. Just one verse prior to the afore mentioned passage we see something all students of prophecy and judgment language should be familiar with.
Why we would do something that when we aren’t caught up in the moment is ludicrous!? The simplistic, obvious answer in a nutshell…
Heather, however, was less than enthusiastic about her role as the doting wife in the mooted media event. “If you sing that tripe at me, my answer will be: ‘No I bloody won’t!’” she hissed. “And who the hell is this Dr Whiplash, anyway, that you’re hanging on his every word! Just because he wears a suit and talks posh you think he’s some great impresario who can tell us what to do! I’ve seen pimps in Soho who’ve got more class than him!”
What if you work construction? Nails, an extra hammer, hard hats, extra boards. Let’s face it, nails bend, hammers break, hard hats chip, and boards warp. Having a solid backup plan saves time and money.
Do you retire and live a life you always wanted?
The scene at the end is really way below Hang-ah’s belt. But that’s the real Jae Ha, somehow. I remember the scene where he deliberately pushed Shi Kyung’s chair for him to fall. And now, since from Episode 1 Hang Ah threatened our Prince, I think it was pay back time for him that’s why he was that cruel. Then again, nobody deserves that. Jae Ha is going to be a tough cookie to crumble.
One of my friends posted this on her Facebook page tonight:
My question is…
P.S. I should be glad that tomorrow is Friday…but the weekends now just mean more studying…not boozing. or fun.
Percy is on the next quest with Annabeth leading the show which makes them go into the labyrinth. The labyrinth which is a place that not many find ways out and if they do they might not be in the same shape that they went in.
1. Experience is vital if you’re going directly into the work world especially if you’re a liberal arts major. After years of study where you imagined it automatically paying off with a salary gig upon completion this can be a bit of a shock. Luckily whether you’ve had a job or not you’ve got experience. Those parties you threw was event planning, social media marketing, and community building voila.
The table settings may look familiar (as in last year), but this year we played dinner a bit more traditional with brined turkey, sauteed beans, scalloped corn, salad, and roasted root veggies. Delish! I think everyone had a great time, I know I did : )
Theatre: Annie
Any treasure with a gp value. Treasure comes in many forms (85-90%)
a dead giveaway that i’m not from around here
01 Trans am (punched to the floor)
To continue, the student then goes on the topic of the professor’s brain and that by having not seen it that the class cannot scientifically believe anything that he says. Based on empirical research, which is “a way of gaining knowledge by means of direct and indirect observation or experience,” we know that the human body cannot survive without a beating heart and a brain to process. We also know through empirical research that all humans have brains and the brain has been studied in depth using all five senses. This same concept flows with testable hypothesis and demonstrated research. If this conversation actually did happen, it is logic and common sense that make us realize that the professor has a brain as it is logical for our bodies to need oxygen to survive naturally.
It proved to be a very long day for me, as I had already performed at the Mt. Hope Beer Fest at the Renaissance Faire grounds with one of my other bands, Mark DeRose and the Way Home, earlier that day. Honestly, it felt more like I had attended the festival as an avid beer drinker and coincidentally also played a bit, as I was only contracted to play two one-hour sets of music with a four-and-a-half layover between sets. Hence the mass quantities of beer samples. OK, that sounds like an oxymoron. Perhaps I will throw up a separate blog about this event.
I can't tell you from personal experience if this works or not… but I'm going to try it soon.
Handicraft: This long history workshop has provided worldwide artists and dancers with top dragon and lion dance costumes for over 120 years. This dragon dance costume is well handmade by the finest traditional craftsmen of this workshop.
If you live in a free man, with the support
That’s it baby — drill baby drill
Unlike the credit bureaus, She will not just forget after seven years.
It shouldn't shock me, but it does, that almost two decades after Rodney King some officers still fail to grasp that with the proliferation of consumer video recorders, they are less and less likely to get away with excessive use of force.
I know its only been 9 days since my last entry but I feel like I've neglected this family journal of mine. I've been taking pictures and starting blog entries I just haven't had the time to complete them or finish editing the pictures. And don't even get me started on how neglected my homemade Christmas gifts have been. Starting to get nervous about that.
Oh... the sketch! I almost forgot!!! This is CLP Sketch Challenge #42 by the oh-so-talented Chelsea. I love love love her sketches!!! I hope that you are able to play along. You have until the end of November to join in the fun!
Prep. time: 90 minutes approx. (stuffing & preparing leaves).
To change the unfortunate situation in the country, it is obvious that a lot has to be done by governments, states and local, the Non-Governmental Organizations and individuals. First, budgets meant for health must be truly expended on same. Such budgetary spending must be monitored by special committees set up to pursue same, while accountability and prudence must be maintained. Professionals should be appointed to oversee ministries of health and health institutions so as to achieve excellence in service delivery, while undue interference by governments has to be checked.
Oh light be, live and see
But you know, sometimes, something will slip by me. Something can sit in one place for so long, that it becomes part of the norm.
I was upstairs feeding Spunky Doodle when my cell phone rang.and a lady told me my dog and husband were hurt three or four streets from our house. She said I should come and I'd see all the police cars and flashing lights. I just threw some food for Spunky on her table and hurried on down to throw some in Manny's bowl, then out the door I went. I was so scared at what I'd find.
Or name
Finally, and swiftly moving onto my third decade, the album that sound tracked my thirty something years is Stay Human by Michael Franti and Spearhead. Laid back, jazz and funk infused, each album track is just superb. It was really hard to pick one but thanks to the limited choice on You Tube I have gone with Soulshine. This happens to be one of my favourites anyway. It always leaves me feeling inspired and hopeful.
While not all of the awards went to Sandler personally, his name was engraved on a total of five Razzies, including those for Worst Actor and Worst Actress – another first for the awards, which annually celebrate the worst in Hollywood. His clean sweep was completed by his inclusion in the awards for Worst Ensemble Cast, Worst Screenplay and Worst On-Screen Couple, which was opened up to a public vote this year.
They prepaid their tenancy and had been their for four days when the earthquake struck.
24. It was a wrong number that started it, the telephone ringing three times in the dead of night, and the voice on the other end asking for someone he was not. —Paul Auster, City of Glass (1985)
The doctor said a broken rib takes about a month to heal. The only recommendation he had was to hold my ribs when I cough. Once we get the cough cleared up we should be good to go. I hope that's sooner than later. I hate feeling this way! I want to do nothing but sit still. I'm supposed to go back in 2-7 days if the pain is still there for a CAT scan. Blah.
For the past week my friend Katelyn and her little girl Leena stayed with us at our house. I have been good friends with Katelyn for the past year online, and this was our first in person meet! We were both very excited and a bit nervous I think :) They got in super late the night before this. We helped unpack the car and then sat around chatting for a bit before we all went to bed.
Frieder Butzmann is not a particularly well-known figure in the US, even by the standards of the avant-garde electronic music he's been making since the 70s, but he's apparently something of a legend in his home country of Germany. Based on this new LP, on which Butzmann combines processed and chopped-up samples of Karlheinz Stockhausen's voice with his own frenetically collaged electronic studies, it's not hard to see why he's earned such respect. Wie Zeit Vergeht is an intense and frantic record that leaps spastically from one idea to the next; sometimes Butzmann's electronics form a deep, churning low-register drone, while at other times sizzling electronic tones skip and splutter like someone's rapidly whipping a radio dial back and forth. Stockhausen's voice shows up periodically, sometimes modulated until he almost seems to be singing, sometimes looped and chopped into rhythmic beats, sometimes manipulated until it seems like just one more element in the chaotic electronic stew. Maybe it's just that I don't understand the language, but Butzmann seems to be using the voice musically, as a sound source rather than for its textual content, which might be a wry way of saying that all musical touchstones, no matter how important or seemingly serious, can and will eventually be incorporated into the music of later generations. Thus Stockhausen's voice, if not exactly his ideas, finds a new place, a new musical life, within the context of Butzmann's often-goofy, always engrossing synthesizer collages. [buy]
Get out of Comfort Zone. Locking yourself up in a quiet room and forcing yourself to come up with an idea is one of the worst things you can possibly do. Instead, unglue yourself from your desk chair and get out. Go somewhere that is unfamiliar territory to you or someplace that you normally don't hang out and see if anything inspires you. While you may want to choose a place that's secluded so that you can gather your thoughts, sometimes it's best to go to areas that are typically crowded, such as the park, a coffee shop or the airport. This is because crowded areas are great places to eavesdrop and "people watch". You don't want to be a creeper about it, but sometimes things you hear or see from unsuspecting sources can make some of the best dialogue or topics.
The student director for this show, Steven, took an immediate dislike to several of us whom he considered 'lily white' and 'useless'. Stefan, another friend called Cee, and I were voted "most likely to still be virgins" by the 'cool kids' in the cast...something that made Stefan angry but enraged Cee, an old-school Southern gentleman who was offended not only for himself, but also on my behalf. Even bringing it up (and it's been oh, almost twelve years ago now) in his presence sends him off into an angry diatribe to this day. It was Little Shop of Horrors, by the way. I was a hooker and Stef and Cee were bums in the opening act.
Largely because I don’t think that being part of the establishment was really specifically defined. Elvis, churning out movies to make huge money for the studio to make artistic films is acceptance by the establishment – because it is what establishment requires from you that defines your role – not you and your needs.
we have become what we have destined to be
We moved on to some singing and action rhymes. Little "R" really tries to sing the words and after the song finishes she is always still singing! She also copies most of the actions and anticipates the next action in a familier song!
Then she asked if she could wear it outside. Wyatt said as she walked out the door, "Mom, are you sure Timber can wear that skirt outside? It's her new one!" I thought about it for a minute. After all, it did rain yesterday and the day before and all we have around the property is gravel, grass and MUD.
it is officially SUMMER!!!!! ah bring on the sun, bbq's, pool time, god life doesn't get any sweeter
Madueke called him over 20 times for help to become
nPower Championship 2012 Play-Offs
John 6:56 "He who eats My flesh and drinks My blood abides in Me, and I in him.
Students then chose cool colors and employed liquid watercolor paint to add a background color to their images.
Making mistakes is part of being human, and most hiring managers will let the occasional blank stare or fumbled sentence slide during an interview. But there are some slip-ups that you just can’t recover from, mistakes so ridiculous that they’ll completely eclipse any potential you may have in the mind of your interviewer.
An imaginary case.
What with his gong-soaking antics and being "drawn towards Dr John", the NME and the heavy press loved Essex at first: "they saw me as a Lou Reed of England if you like. Then the Jackie magazine thing took hold - I hadn't changed musically but they dropped me like a ton of bricks." This kind of press reaction has inspired some dreadful self-pity over the years, epitomised by Stereophonics' bilious Mr Writer. "The cutting edge media response was 'Oh no, he's David Cassidy after all!' Essex responded with the self-effacing Gonna Make You A Star and scored another number one.
DD - p.65 - 68
Gloria and Roxy meet again by accident while Roxy is working at the Hump Bar and Gloria comes in for a drink. There she finally starts talking to Roxy and she learns that Gloria might not even love her new husband. This all changes when he gets heat exhaustion and ends up in the hospital and Gloria realizes that she loves him.
I have plied the magic arts of public relations since I left journalism in the late 1960s. There was no difficulty making the transition. PR is a form of journalism insofar as it packages information, but it adds the element of advocacy. The objective is the maintenance and protection of a good reputation and good will.
Ha!, little did she know just how far away from milky drinks my plans were. I can report it does an excellent job.
2. “negative and positive space with hands”
Don’t forget our New Challenge will be posted tomorrow morning hope you can all join us again.
A quick glance outside in our 1:30 and I can see a flashing smear of light ahead... Approach lights baby! The fuselage is cranked nose left in the crosswind.
1/4 cup granulated white sugar
My life has to be practice, and I have to surrender to that idea and accept my gift of desperation.
The More the Merrier – 2
And then there’s water. I’m not really sure if not drinking enough water could result in a plateau, but it’s worth a try if you are stuck in one. We are told to drink about 100 oz of water a day!
And yes, I'm shaking a little in my shoes as I type those words. I know how crazy that sounds. A full grant is $20,000. That's a big pile of money.
An LNP staffer has resigned after sending an email to a Queensland feminist about the superiority of men, telling her to "get a life" and calling her a "sourpuss" for writing an opinion piece about the need for more women in parliament.
*Spray bottle with water (mini misters are wonderful)
The Tolerable: Pretty impressive looking, see that person in the foreground of the picture? Can get 15 feet tall, lush green leaves mixed with shades of purple, big funky spike fruits would make a gnarly projectile
Siena and Lucas are remodeling their play house, now being turned into a club house, getting a complete wash, cleaning, paint, and new furniture.
STARRING: Noomi Rapace, Michael Fassbender, Guy Pearce, Charlize Theron, Idris Elba, Logan Marshall-Green, Patrick Wilson, Rafe Spall
Last week I got a mid length upper from DSA to replace the one I screwed up. I put thirty rounds down range to get the AR zeroed with the new upper last week, and today I put another 90 down range with no issues.
Well... that's a long answer. Mostly, because I really did it the wrong way, first. Let's see... I did all of the editing myself. But! I have a degree in English, and I have worked as an editor before, so it wasn't a hard stretch for me. However, I did learn one thing, editing on the computer is hard. I noticed so much more when I had the actual, physical book in my hand, so, if anyone is thinking of self-editing, I would highly suggest having a physical copy to look at to do that with. Even if you're just going to e-publish, it could be worth going through CreateSpace -just- to get a proof copy to hold in your hand and edit from. The other main thing I did was read the book out loud. As I said, I read the book in my kids' classes at school, both as I was writing it and from the proof, and that really helps to catch awkward sounding sentences. As for the formatting... well, that was no fun. Everyone wants something different. CreateSpace wanted it as a pdf, which I had never used before, so I had to figure that out, meaning I had to make a bunch of mistakes before I got it to work. The Kindle required different formatting when I went back to do the second edition than it had required the first time, so that took some doing, too. I'm not a very techy person, so all of these things are the kids of things I wish I had someone else to do for me. Heh
In the bowl of a food processor, chop the onion and parsley. Add the beef and the rest of the ingredients and process until it is all combined and looks like a paste. Form the meat into cylinder shapes around a skewer. If using wooden skewers, soak before using.
I asked Jack the other day if he was scared to spank me.
Graphics & Music
Operation Write Home has asked for Mother's Day cards to send to the troops and I've been meaning to get some made for weeks now. This seemed like a perfect time to start. If you enter the challenge, you even have a chance to win a prize. The cards are due to the shipper by march 20th. That's not very far away is it?
‘What do you mean?’
106) Chicks dig me. I wear colored undywear.
You might have seen the recent buzz, and it is true. Graeter's Ice Cream is now in HEB's. To launch in their new market, Graeter's Ice Cream sent several bloggers some samples of their French Pot ice cream. The French pot method isn't easy, and it makes only two gallons at a time. A French pot spins around a blade as the ice cream freezes and thus scraping the sides, as opposed to the blade spinning inside of a pot (which is like many home ice cream machines). I'm not sure how different the French pot method is to other commercial methods, but I will tell you that I was really intrigued by the chocolate adding process. In tasting the ice creams, the chocolate was like random pieces of ganche as opposed to consistent small pieces of chocolate. And this I liked. According to their website, someone hand mixed low-melting temperature chocolate into the two gallons of ice cream at a time.
I love
My son went to daycare today, and it was the first time in a long time, where I actually didn’t want him to go. I missed him before he even left. I’ve missed him before, but something was different today. I guess all the flowers, sunshine and happiness coming with spring are showing me how to be an even better mom than the one on the johnsons baby commercial.
We kept our cool and finished the conversation.
With exams quickly approaching I might be a bit late dealing with this question – but work has been manic so I’ve not been blogging.
That’s what I’ve been coming across in my studies recently, with both reading & writing. When you get to a point or a bottleneck where you think, “Shit, I’m stuck. And I have no idea how to figure this out. No one to ask either…” there are often things I could do that I overlook. I don’t know why. Sometimes I just do.
The soft dirt path was easy on the feet but the tunnel of trees seemed to go on endlessly as far as Derrek could see both ways. Once Naida had been convinced that he was going to behave and follow at a good pace she let go of his arm and let him trot behind her. They walked briskly, but in such a way that it didn’t really feel any more strenuous than a leisurely stroll. Derrek could tell just from her tall sturdy build she was no stranger to walking, and he was suddenly glad he was no stranger to it himself.
It's also situated in the city centre, about 3 minutes on foot from the main shopping area, so when I get tired of writing alone in my room, I can pack up my laptop and saunter into Costa in Waterstones or Starbucks or whatever, and write there amidst the bustle of shoppers.
Also, ETSY has tons of adorable printables for pretty cheap, there are some cute western themed clothes, crayons, etc. there too!
This spring, one of my must haves is a pair of colored jeans. I'd like them in several colors and styles but I'd settle for one stand out pair that is a great color and fits well. Pants aren't my friend. Finding ones that fit my apple shape is a challenge. I know that even my well proportioned friends have a tough time finding pants. I'm leaning toward a pair of Not Your Daughter's Jeans. If I'm lucky, I will find a pair at Nordstrom Rack sometime soon. If not, I think I'll have to break down and splurge on a pair. There are so many options available, that I went searching for a few favorites. I've found them in all sizes and colors.
The company wants to sell a vacation package so Man Bo makes sure that the one they pick is in the city Park Ha has moved to. She happens to have found a job as a tour guide for a travel company so when Yi Gak shows up to check out the vacation package, guess who is his guide? Girl has never lived in Jinan and during the recession, she finds a job in less than a week and is already trained well enough to guide guests.
Designer Ginger Barber created literal movement with the striped floor covering, which coordinate with the steps in the foreground. The camel colored check slipcovered chair coordinate with the organic shades in the window, which draw the eye around the room as well. House Beautiful, July 2009.
Want another tall tale? Patricia McKissack's, A Million Fish ... More or Less, about the weird things that happen in the Bayou Clapateaux, is one of our favorites. Papa-Daddy and Elder Abbajon come rowing by while Hugh Thomas is trying to catch some fish, and remind him of some of their adventures in the bayou. After they leave, he catches a million fish (more or less), and then has his own strange encounters with the creatures of the bayou.
Handcrafted Item
Melissa writes a chicken blog, but recently she's begun a new adventure with bees. (Next she'll probably get a goat! Homesteading is kind of addicting like that!) Her new bird bath is ready and waiting to serve as a drinking bowl for her small buzzing friends, complete with a little landing area right in the center (for bee safety of course - no drowning victims, please!).
POE: It’s ten pages. It’s a lot shorter than the healthcare bill which was 2,000 pages long. I’ll give you my copy of it if you would like to have a copy. Even though you haven’t read the law, do you have an opinion as to whether it’s Constitutional?
The hard, quantifiable fact is that the peaceful majority, the 'silent majority,' is cowed and extraneous.
The 'headline speaker' was Rev Peter Owen Jones and he was as charismatic, engaging. approachable and yet enigmatic as you imagine him to be. A deeply spiritual man. Deeply thoughtful and wise - I admire people who pause carefully before answering a question - the answer is usually worth waiting for. He gave a talk on the environment. our planet. the future of religions as he saw it and where he saw humanity in all of this. Widely traveled he had tales to tell as you can imagine.
Actually, it takes more than just understanding business deadlines to win. The equation gets a little more complex because you have to add the concept of trust. You have to invest in relationships one person at a time. You have to deliver on your promises.
For all these reasons, we in Singapore end up importing talent. This practice opens up another can of polemic worms. Are they compensated a bit too fairly? Do we get blinded by their impressive labels, while losing sight of their real level of talent? How does the generous compensation scheme for the foreign talents affect the local talents?
Squeeze 1 lime into the pot, saving the second lime to flavor individual servings
Which waves in every raven tress,
Insight and outsight– they’re all on the run.
And...we're off! King of the Cannes selection Thierry Fremaux and His Royal Cannesness Gilles Jacob announced the official selection for this year's famous French festival at a press conference in Paris yesterday. The lineup is especially American and star-powered this year and features so many anticipated titles I don't even know where to begin. How about here? Voilà some of my stories from today's event. It's the usual suspects, but I don't see this as a bad thing. When else can we see films from Audiard, Haneke, Cronenberg (DEUX Cronenbergs!), Resnais, Salles, Kiarostami, Carax... not to mention anticipated titles from auteurs like Lee Daniels, Jeff Nichols, Andrew Dominik and Im Sang-soo (I LOVED The Housemaid, can't wait to see what The Taste of Money tastes like on screen!) It's the most exciting lineup in years in my opinion. I also send my regards to the Un Certain Regard category -- the trailer for Xavier Dolan's Laurence Anyways has me very excited to see a cross-dressing Melvil Poupaud in this film and I'm also looking forward to Catherine Corsini's Les 3 Mondes, seeing if Cronenberg deux (namely, Brandon) has inherited his father's talents, Benoit Delepine and Gustave Kervene's Le Grand Soir and of course Sylvie Verheyde's film with Charlotte Gainsbourg and Pete Doherty!
It turns out that he was a local in the know. He told me that there were two ways (more if I wanted to undertake the perilous desert crossing but he skimmed over that as I’m a woman) to get to Ankh-Morpork. Sailing there from the harbour, he said, would take a long time. Instead he advised me to use the International Carriage Route (ICR), a magical mode of transport that drastically cut down on the travel time. It was easy, he said, and I’d be in Ankh-Morpork in less than a day.
The screaming. The threats. The criticism. The hatred. The disdain. The anger. So much anger. So much pain. So much rejection. So much sadness. So much humiliation. So much fear.
I think I'll have one in every color before the summer ends.
I KNOW! Hardly light out and she already called!
So that one is definitely a moment of preparation.
I was feeling a little down because 2011 was definitely not my year and I was glad it was over, but what good is dwelling on it? Life goes on whether I do or not and I might as well make the best of it! I have never been a negative person and one thing I am certain of is that God is with me in good times and bad. When it feels like I am alone, I just remember that I made His cross heavy but He helps carry mine. Which brings me to why I thought about sharing my thoughts – I was thinking about all the wonderful people I know and how they have helped me in many ways, sometimes with only a smile or a kind word. That got me thinking about one of my favorite bible verses which fits well with what I was seeing and feeling and I think everyone should let their light shine!
"Sixty-nine dead!" I gasped "How many were on the plane?"
P.S. this rendition could not wake the dead
The espanol spoken in Buenos Aires is quite different from what you’re probably used to hearing. We talked about you and pronounce the Y as SH (ie, to say the word I do not say io, say sho). CHE word we use much (kinda like saying hey) and good slang and hear a lot when you are there …
Okay time to learn a little about Dot.
I knew what I could live with and what was a deal-breaker.
Gregory: fair enough
She had a great time with the swim, failed to get eaten by a shark, and they raised money. As mentioned in the original posting, she came in only at the last minute to fill a gap in the team.
The eggplant – a vegetable as versatile and tasty as, say, the potato but better for you and in my opinion, even more delicious. Especially when bubbling away in my oven as we speak after being morphed into a moussaka. YUM!
A Facebook post tells me that I should hit the streets and sell the benefits of massage to everyone I meet: that my business (as opposed to my work) is all about selling. I bridle at that. I'm useless as a salesman, in the first place: nobody in their right mind would set me to selling anything. The first thing I do with a pitch is queer it. I don't like tooting my own horn, and I don't like tooting horns in the received wisdom parade. I don't like tooting horns at all.
One of those studios was run by Ub Iwerks, the animator enticed by Disney’s former distributor Pat Powers in 1930 to walk away from that nasty old Uncle Walt and make his own cartoons that Powers would gladly rent to theatres through M-G-M.
“What?” I asked somewhat annoyed. I don’t know if they knew my adoption status or not. ”Well I mean if H. left her, why did she keep her baby?” I made a face, because I am bad at that. I said incredulously, “You don’t give your baby away just because you get dumped” I laughed ironically.
Which brings me to this thing I call “Cosmic Synchronicity” – a string of separate events, occurring within a reasonably short period of time of one another, that seem tied together in meaning somehow, but by means which are themselves beyond my ability to explain. I know that’s quite a mouthful and I’m really sorry I can’t explain it any better. And yet, I’d be willing to bet that you understand exactly what I mean anyway.
Apples.
And fall unto the adoring crowd’s eager ears.
Metaphorically speaking, that is. About the only time I use a pen anymore is to sign my name to something.
A friendly owner
Aryc guffawed. “Thanks for the amusement, Gunny.” He rose, pulled out the blade, licked it off and resheathed it. As Beethoven began the final movement in the Ninth Symphony, Aryc left, locking the door behind him.
Preheat oven to 325 degrees. Combine ingredients in two seperate mixing bowls. Spray inside of cupcake holders with nonstick spray. Using either two spoons and scooping vanilla and chocolate into cupcake holders or rolled up parchment paper filling with chocolate and then another filled with vanilla squeeze into cupcake holders. Bake for 18 min.
As regular vistors to our webcam will know, our falcons are currently incubating two eggs, one of which is believed to be the first peregrine egg to be laid egg in a monitored nest in the UK this year.
“Rates of the disease – spread to humans by mosquitoes that have fed on infected kangaroos and wallabies – will at least double, said Stephen Doggett, a senior scientist at Westmead Hospital, and could rise much higher.”
I invite you to be part of that.
A nice plank-top farm table (sorry Tammy not big enough for you) and some great little cabinets,boxes, etc. Wrapped in the apple baskets are some of those great blue ball jars we all love for our flowers, buttons, or whatever. We are also finding some wonderful old ladders this time. If you haven't discovered how great they are in your home for hanging quilts, you might want to try one out!
born: 9/18/1766
Russell read the email and felt a cold chill upon his face, as if someone had just whispered something dreadful in his ear.
The weather is amazing in Bangalore...slight drizzle.....cloudy....comfortably cold...love to have piping hot tea with something to munch on.Glad I made these miniature biscuits...blends perfectly well with my hot tea.
Darth Brand’s dreaded NCAA Clearinghouse choke hold of the Sith.
"I learn by going where I have to go."
As promised, I’m finally submitting to you THE PAIN MERCHANTS by Janice Hardy. What I love most is the ethical question at the core of this novel. At the most basic level, this novel is about whether the ends justify the means and the main character Nya is more than willing to sacrifice a principle or two in order to save her sister.
05. Like There¹s No Tomorrow
Does anyone have any advice for me? My biggest weakness is junk food: lollies and chips… I have gotten better with these recently, but sometimes it is just too hard to resist!
You must apply in writing, for example by letter or email. Your employer might have a standard form or see Directgov or booklet ER36 (Northern Ireland).
It didn’t help that Victoria tried to get Charlotte to seduce Declan in order to make sure Daniel wasn’t screwed during the trial and the rather unwelcome return of Adam supplying Charlotte drugs was another bummer moment as well. It looks like things are only going to get much worse for Charlotte than better.
Life has been hectic of late. So many places to be and things to make happen. All good stuff but just a lot of good stuff. I needed a slow day or I felt like I would combust into a pile of dust and really there is enough things to be cleaning up around here so I don't need to add to it!
And...they handed us instructions to his workshop, about 25 miles more away. "He's waiting to meet you."
Both of our counter-organisations are feeling emasculated from the effect our organisation has had on them. They can see the end is coming for them like the little light at the end of the tunnel. There is no reason to get into arguments with them. The truth always prevails. That’s why our organisation is so successful and theirs are diminishing. They are peasants compared to us. The MDL even copied our name - lol. These are members of the Islamic community that feel so passionately for what they stand for, not one of them could come up with an innovative notion for a brand for themselves. They look up to us and even duplicate our style of running an organisation - lol. It’s nice to be looked up to though.
Design Analysis:
It’s always lovely to receive a gift that someone has taken the time to create themselves. So why not think about planting up an indoor display for someone you know? This article will give you some tips on what containers to use and which plants work best.
The waves have a triangular or pyramid shape, the form of the wave moves under the "skin" of the water. If you were to throw a paper boat onto the wave it would be lifted but not carried along as the wave moved beneath it. Though the underlying shape of the wave moves forward, the little paper boat remains pretty much in the same place.
Some fun papers and this delightful Studio G stamp from Mike's $1.50 bin brought this card together in no time. Love it when that happens :)
My tongue feels pure joy
Thank you so much for stopping by today.. This is the last week of our month long Blogaversary celebrations. We have had such a great time with everyone and I am looking forward to the 2nd year of fun and creativity with everyone. Today I would like to share with you my MMSC55 card. I know there are a ton of fairy digi’s on the market , but I wanted to create one that I envisioned.
This is funny actually. To hear him tell it, obama actually killed bin laden himself. Which we all know is bullshit. He couldn't actually give the command to take the guy out. Instead he did what he does best, he voted present. Sure, he was in the room when the deed went down, but it wasn't on his command.
“NO, SIR.”
WOW! What a turn of events. I recently started a new job which was complicating my surrogacy plans. After speaking with someone from the agency, I decided to put my surrogacy plans on hold for one month. Well, on 4/3, I came home from work and felt like I already wanted to quit my job so I could pursue the surrogacy. I decided to take a pregnancy test to make sure everything could go as I'd hoped, but then everything came crashing down. The pregnancy test was a clear, without-a-doubt positive. After totally losing it and throwing a bit of a fit, I calmed down and let the news sink in.
a backward glance,
Here is Stevens leaving Austin. We are not told of his wife leaving before him. Again, my bold.
This photo was taken February 18, 2011.
I was very kindly sent some products from the Liz Earle team about 3 months ago and I have been using them everyday. I waited for the dreaded eruption I often get from new products so delayed the review until I was 100% sure of the results.
~Happy anniversary
Post 145 of 180
Finland did a study on truck crash causation as did the FMCSA using statistics from the Michigan State Patrol, neither showed a predominance of fatigue as factors causing the accidents cited. Finland 2%, Michigan 2.4%. Overall, accidents involving commercial vehicles has gone down and stayed relatively flat over the last 3 years.
A model of the plant Hoth
At the time it was brewed, What's Brewing was published bearing Roger Protz's op-ed labelling beer writers and bloggers as 'noisome'. So, for a while, this beer was Noisome Cru. Note the pump clip pic has been modified to protect the innocent.
The mirrors clatter
The baseball fields where I spent countless summer nights as a player and spectator have been abandoned for years, victims of hard times and a general decline in baseball interest among urban kids:
Little Aaliyah Johnson’s body was laid to rest and a teenaged relative has been charged with her murder. The more details of this story I hear, the more I think that the Children’s Bill, while extremely necessary (Get on it Verna…leave Cheryl Miller alone!), can’t begin to scratch the surface of the problem. The story in today’s Express shows a young woman caught in a vicious cycle that includes poverty, low self-esteem and bad life style choices all around. Where to start with uprooting the problem which I feel must start with a deterioration in family structures and communal support systems?
So I headed straight to our winter mitten/scarf/hat bin, and then when that still wasn't making my magic number of "24" I got out the paper and staples and made some mittens the quick and easy way. Walah!
That’s nothing new. That’s not doing a favor to anyone. The question is under what circumstances will a Palestinian state be established. I don’t have to help in the establishment of something that wants to wipe me out. But that the Palestinians have the right to be a people in their own state, in their territory somewhere between the river and the sea, goes without saying.
It would probably be too expensive for the shoe-string free show organisers to start printing/administering press passes.
In doing prep today I came across some very interesting charts. These charts were a comparison over the last couple of General Conferences that have been held. These charts compared the major concerns of this General Conference with delegate concern in the 2008, and 2004 General Conferences. Look how they compare, from most important to the least important:
Wild! Shelly Manne plays odd percussion behind Jack Marshall's jazzy guitar, and the two of them run through an odd bunch of tracks that will stretch the dynamic range of your stereo. More "hi fi" than jazz, but with a firm jazz base -- even though there's odd bits like shoeboxes, whistling, and handclaps. Cuts include "The Girls of Sao Paulo", "The Rain in Spain", and "Choros".
David Says: July 26, 2011 at 10:11 pm
Danza Negra
For Savannah's birthday, I treated her to a photo session on the opposite end of my camera lens. When she came in from school on that important day, we went outside and I have to tell you, I had a ball. She is so photogenic as you will see, and in spite of my inexperience, we got some really good shots.
Smoking promotes wrinkles and gives skin a dull, dry and discolored look. It encourages the destruction of collagen. Collagen gives the skin its youthful appearance. Smoking also robs the body of valuable vitamins and nutrients. Avoid smoking at all costs, while you still can.
Today is Valentine’s Day for those who have someone to spend it with. To others, today might also be called Single Awareness Day. Hahaha.
“I was truly moved.”
b) One of the reasons I love both literature and historical study (which were my two majors in college) is that you form relationships with your subjects. There are enormous wealths in these fields if only we will, as one friend puts it, put ourselves in the path of that which is marvelous. Even if we feel alone in the present moment as we suffer through an abusive relationship, we are never alone when we look to the past. Something that has truly surprised me just in the past two months as I’ve been thinking and reading on these matters more deeply is how often this problem of church abuse comes up in church history. Even in the US, this is nothing new. In the past six months I’ve become more acquainted with five different men from my parents’ generation whose experience in and critique of the church would be almost identical to my own. Go back and watch that Keith Green video I posted on Easter: At the end he talks about how all a lot of people have seen of Christianity is “churchianity” and how they’re tired of the hypocrisy and the lies. But, Green adds, “there are real Christians out there. The word Christian means little Christ and it means we’re supposed to be a bunch of little Jesuses running around.” I don’t know a better synopsis of Spencer’s book, both in its critique of the church and its picture of Christ, and Green was saying that in 1982. Likewise, Philip Yancey and Michael Spencer both come from the same generation. Spencer was born in 1958 and Yancey in 1949.
Mama’s tears came when you wanted to come to me,
Unfortunately, your habits and values work against you. You cannot fight terror and street mobs with letters to your Congressmen. You cannot fight accusations of racism with prayer meetings. You cannot appeal to the goodness of your fellow man when the fellow man despises you for your weakness and hacks off the arms and legs of his political opponents.
After F.W. de Klerk opened the floodgates and these criminals were allowed back in SA, along with Nigerian drug lords, we saw gang wars in 1996 with hand grenades chucked over garden walls, etc.
My great-grandmother never starred on a Tv reality show. She never earned a million dollars, or signed a record deal, or any of the things that make people famous in 2011. But those who had the good fortune to know her were blessed, and I'd like to try and share some of that blessing with you.
As I said before, I fully expected the system to be a success the first week. The backlash came at different times for the 7 and 4 year old. Once they start losing tickets and then really not being able to do the things they're used to doing, that's when reality sets in for them. My kids reacted with disdain and continued losing tickets until they realized there was no way out but to come full circle back to complying with the system. At times, they were proud of each other for their accomplishments, working together to earn privilege passes so they could have sleep overs in each other's rooms. Other times, they were competitive with each other, basking in the lost tickets of the other.
Esposito’s thesis that the industry is currently in stage 3 of a 5-stage progression captures the essence of the Gordian knot that most publishers are currently faced with. Our current revenue streams come from old technologies and old financial models and systems – yet we need to fund new technologies and new financial models – for which we currently have few defined supply chain systems (and I’m using supply chain in the broad sense of getting a product or service to the consumer here). Plus there’s the complication that we have little evidence that these delivery methods can be financially self-supporting in terms of profit, cash management or subsidiary revenue streams.
And now here are the other blogs I highly reccomend and which I will be nominating for the award..Unfortunately I could only think of 12 because some that I follow are very specific and probably don’t come into the category of versatile…
This is the first beer I had after returning from Europe last year. We were in Spain for the last month of our trip and there were no hoppy beers to be found in the entire country (save for the one pale ale I found at a beer bar in Valencia, and even that was a stretch). Towards the end of our journey I was quite homesick and longing for that bitter bite of the hop. This was the beer I pined for. And who knew, it's even available in Brownsville, TX, lucky for me.
To be a part of a community that are breaking the rules, pushing the boundaries, opening doors or even just sharing the everyday 'sameness' of life is so exciting. To finally put faces to names (or Twitter handles!) was one of the most gratifying parts of my day, as was the realisation that people HAVE read my blog!
This isn't the first, and it certainly won't be the last example of spokespeople bringing a boost to a brand.
Yesterday there was a story how the Newark and Camden areas are among the 25 peaceful areas in the country. I made sure “area” was in what I posted, and it was in the headline on the article. But people didn’t see the word “area,” I guess, or didn’t read the article which define what area meant. The discussion was on Newark and Camden themselves.
If there’s one thing I learned from practicing estate planning in Southwest Florida, it’s the importance of client communication. It is (or should be) well known among attorneys that the perennial number one complaint clients have about them is lack of communication. Polls and complaints to state bar and legal watchdog organizations routinely show that nothing bothers clients more not being kept informed of the progress of their case and not having their phone calls or e-mails returned. Laypersons or inexperienced attorneys are sometimes surprised to learn that malpractice and the mishandling of client funds take a back seat to mere silence in the hierarchy of grievances. But it makes sense. For lawyers, each case is one of dozens to be juggled and prioritized simultaneously, but for ordinary folks, legal actions are intense little bundles of hope, fear, or anger. Trusting your case to a lawyer and then waiting in the dark to hear what it happening is like dropping a sick child off at the hospital and then not being told whether or not she’s getting better or worse.
love is enlightening!
Now I’m old-fashioned. A woman, I consider, should be womanly. I have no patience with the modern neurotic girl who jazzes from morning till night, smokes like a chimney, and uses language which would make a Billingsgate fishwoman blush. Later on the girl responds in her own manner: Your idea of a woman is someone who gets on a chair and shrieks if she sees a mouse. That’s all prehistoric.
There is no proof, just circumstantial evidence, presumption… and we can’t think of anyone else, so: “al-Qaeda have launched several attacks”.
PS: The lovely Ronke from Ondo Lady has been featuring bloggers and their work spaces on her blog this month and today she has featured me! Check it out over at Ondo Lady.
44. Notable Scottish inventions include the method of logarithms(1614), tarmac (1820) and the pneumatic tyre (1887).
Each player takes turn rolling the 2 dice. Whatever two number you roll, you multiply together. You find that "product" (fancy term for answer in math) and place a token. When you have 4 tokens in a row, you win. I hope this gives you some inspiration to try and incorporate your Cricut crafting into school projects. I think Alexander did a fabulous job creating a fun and practical game! Have great day! As always thank you for taking the time follow and leave a comment not only here at She's A Sassy Lady but also on my personal blog at 217 Creations.
Earlier this week researchers at the University of Texas at El Paso issued a report about the 24 counties in Texas, New Mexico, Arizona and California which are on the U.S.-Mexican border. If those counties were a 51st state, they would rank first in federal crime, second in tuberculosis, third in hepatitis and fifth in diabetes. This 51st state would be near the bottom in educational achievement, near the bottom in the number of people who have any type of insurance, near the bottom in doctor/patient ratios and near the bottom in per capita income. Basically, this 51st state would be an American glimpse into the third world. We hear loud voices in our country, claiming that we need illegal immigrants are necessary to fill jobs Americans don’t want. Many, but not nearly all, of those voices come from the hispanic community. But don’t hispanics realize that they will disproportionately bear the burden of the crime, disease and poverty Mexico is exporting to us? Also, it’s one thing to argue that we need illegals to fill jobs, but it’s quite another thing to argue that we need a constant and ever-increasing flood of them to fill jobs.
Dawn Dish Soap $.99 -$0.50/1 Dawn Product, (P&G 07/31/11)
4. If it is difficult for you to go home every year, then stay in touch with fellow expats who are also thinking of heading back home so you can share your experiences with someone going through the same things as you
I liked the horses in the Mane Event.
(5) Ice the cake or cupcakes on site, if possible.
government to what we have conveyed about our willingness to sit
Now, my less than 2 year old original iPad can’t run some apps and it cost more than the lens did. Wonder what Apple’s response would be if I asked them to upgrade it?
Today is also the day to send in the poems for Writer’s Digest. So that has to be done as well! I’ve got an idea for a story – actually it’s based on a real life story – which I’m itching to write. Time……
When: Wednesday, May 2, 2012 – 11am to 12noon Mountain Time (Canada)
Rowdy Rathore the Hindi remake of a Telugu Film Vikramarkudu directed by Prabhu Deva. Sanjay Leela Bhansali and Ronnie Screwvala are the producers. Akshay Kumar has been featured in double role. Sonakshi Sinha is her co-star in the film. Film is scheduled to be released on 15 June, 2012. The television right of Rowdy Rowdy Rathore has broken the record and sold in Rs 45 crore.
A Vatican newspaper has suggested that abortion providers who terminate ill fetuses and proponents of euthanasia are using the same arguments in their defense as did Nazi Germany in its eugenics program of mass extermination.
He's not called "Doctor Who". Tsk. Anyway, the best Doctor is always the current one and your favourite is always the one whom you grew up watching. That's probably too obtuse an answer to get a point.
Jaxon was Baptized!
I used a 1/8 gingham shirting from Fashion Fabrics Club. I never could get those little darts to work out perfectly. I think they may need to be stitched just a hair deeper. Honestly I forgot about fixing it, and now I don't care! That happens alot. I shouldn't sweat most of the stuff I carry on about in my head.
Martha is so darn cute when she's geographically- (and historically)-challenged. I didn't have the heart to tell her that Sylvania is a town in Finland where they make lightbulbs.
Forget Koontz. Forget even Stephen. Straub is, without a doubt, the reigning King of horror.
05.12: Singsang, Malmö, Sweden
“I just like the idea that if you can imagine it, you can build it. There are limitless opportunities to build new things”
“In hindsight, I slid into arrogance based upon past success,” Hastings said. “We have done very well for a long time by steadily improving our service, without doing much CEO communication.”
thank you so much for joining us! We can't wait to see what you make!
Then, Friday another email. Grace extended that I do not deserve, hope and restoration chosen when death and excommunication would be easier. Understanding and assurance and the door left open when I was sure it would be slammed in my face. There is no clearer way to see Jesus in a believer than when they extend unwarranted forgiveness to you.
“When sandalwood pulp with aguru, kuṅkuma and musk is mixed with camphor and spread on Kṛṣṇa’s body, it combines with Kṛṣṇa’s own original bodily perfume and seems to cover it.
According to the Q1 report Feinberg has just used his last $80,000 to post the above ad on Fox News for the week. He could really use all the support he can get from fellow conservatives, whether it be monetarily, passing on the word, or with manpower, to beat the RINO Tim Murphy.
The real heart of The Exorcist, for me, has never been the operatic A-plot of a priest with doubts rebuilding his faith to fight evil, but the small, domestic B-plot of a single mother's personal hell of knowing that there's something wrong with her daughter, she doesn't know what it is, and there's nothing she can do to help. It is horror that comes from confusion and impotence, and Burstyn's depiction of a scared, helpless mother is one of the great onscreen performances of a parent in that decade, certainly, if not in all the annals of American cinema. And it's all there, right in that shot: the big scary needle giving us a jolt of oh my God what the fuck? and then that transition to Chris, thinking absolute the same thing, only it's worse for her than it can ever be for us. As much a s the performance sells this shot, it's also immediately obvious, I presume, how the visuals of the window frame and the reflection on the glass obscuring the people watching add to our awareness that Chris is trapped in two ways: strangled and boxed in by her own anxiety, and in a very literal, physical way, she's being forcibly separated from her scared, sick daughter. it's this very human, very secular fear that is, to me, the most touching and successful part of The Exorcist, and it's never more soul-wracking than in this single moment.
2109.***E-VI/13/2002. On the ready condemnation of a “dirty bomb” suspect by officials who had failed to anticipate a monstrous assault. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-30.)
Don’t speak too much honeyed words to your Thai love or they may think that you are a playboy. Do not boast what you have and what you do not have. Thai girls prefer a man who loves them and dislike dishonest men even though they have a big wealth.
The young ones run Your way;
In other news, I'm so excited to share with you how proud I am of my dear friend Kristen. She's a phenomenal bead weaver that works magic with Fireline and seedbeads. She's self-taught, learning from patterns originally. Once she started to get confident in how the patterns were created she started to modify (or MacGuyver-ize them as I say) to fit her available stash. As she modified those tutorials and patterns, her beady brain started to go in a completely different direction. And it began to think of it's own ideas and patterns.
Whatever has gone wrong, it's time, Mrs Rigby thinks, for him to take himself out of both the media and the political spotlights, otherwise we might soon be reading his obituary.
We get some much needed back story on these events from the research of daughter Ali and Kristi’s interaction with her sister, returning actress Katie Featherstone. According to Ali’s research, demonic hauntings can be the result of bargains with the Devil gone bad. The way she reads it, Kristi and Katie’s great-great-grandmother brokered a deal with the devil for wealth and power. The price: a first born son. Hunter turns out to be the first male born to Kristi and Katie’s family since the 1920s.
TMZ reported that Seau shot himself. The North County Times also reported the death was the result of a suicide. The newspaper reported that a housekeeper found Seau with a gunshot wound in his chest.
1) Soak 300gms of Rice Vermicelli in water until it is soft
-hurricanranna from the top is blocked by Sheamus
**109 brush: A contour brush that many people use for liquid foundation. Provides a flawless airbrushed finish -- I am planning on buying a second one.
I have been playing a lot of Frank Lowe lately.
The idea of a marked treasure map was made popular in Robert Louis Stevenson’s book Treasure Island, published in 1883, but he wasn’t the first author to play with this concept. Thirty-four years earlier James Fenimore Cooper’s novel, The Sea Lions, begins with the death of a sailor who leaves behind ‘two old, dirty and ragged charts’, which lead to a location in the West Indies where pirates have buried treasure.
"How can it be her fault?" "Because it was my skirt and my husband and your glass floor." - The Doctor and Amy
I used two different Tibetans in the movie. The first one, with the red merino/firestar yarn, was crafted by The Spanish Peacock. The second, smaller Tibetan Lite was crafted by Grizzly Mountain Arts. Weight is not a big factor with Tibetans, so I never bothered to put them on a scale. The Spanish Peacock spindle is 13" from stem to stern. The Tibetan Lite is only 10". Both are perfectly balanced and a delight to both the eye and the hand.
And anyway, fame! Wikifame! What better feeling could you get from snapping a picture of a pile of plastic bits?
What’s your favorite Caddyshack moment? Which actor do you feel stole the show? Did you ever pull the “doodie” trick on anyone in a swimming pool near you? Which of the movie-fun-facts listed above surprises you the most? What other comedies would you like to see on The Titter Factor? I’d love to hear from you!
Excited by this new bit of information, Helen decides to verify it by searching through the newspaper archives. She finds articles mentioning over 20 different unsolved homicides, all with a vague connection to Candyman. So much for narrowing down her search.
Bellarmine University
Recently, I had a conversation with a friend that surprised me a little. While we talked it became clear that they thought the BURN was more about worship than prayer. I agree, there is pretty much always worship going on at the BURN in one way or another, but it highlighted a misunderstanding about what we’re up to at the BURN every time we come together. As I’ve so often said, the BURN gatherings are NOT worship events – we’re part of the expression of the ‘house of prayer’ in Bradford.
There’s french beans (sultana with a few purple ones, purple teepee), runner beans (Stenner, Moonlight), Beetroot (Burpee’s Golden) – roasted beetroot has been a revelation for us this summer – lettuce (Little Gem) and courgette (Black Beauty).
Most significantly for our purposes today - the organisation of the IPG itself was literally transformed by our specifying and implementing a new database that could act as the administrative, commercial and communications engine for the organisation. With one fundamental technological shift, the executive was liberated from the need to keep multiple address lists for different purposes (finance, events billing, membership subscriptions, publications, mailing labels and so on). And in doing so, we finally had time to engage with the very real issues facing the industry – rather than merely administrating a handful of annual get-togethers. Whenever I am anxious about forthcoming technological change, I think back to the enormous benefits we reaped grasping and deploying a new technology at the IPG.
The bar lady puts me pint in front of me, and I neck half of it down in one go! All this possible afterlife stuff is thirsty business! I look down onto the bar. The bloke in black has some strange looking typewriter in front of him! "What the hell is that mate?!" I ask.
My personal experience is that men who truly are heterosexual and comfortable being heterosexual have absolutely no problem with gays. However, those that are not secure in their sexuality seem to prove to be squeaky wheels, or at least they were being squeaked. Again, I ask when is enough enough? When do we stop rewarding bigoted behavior? When will companies like Nike say: “sorry, but we don’t want homophobic bigots representing our company? Click here to see the full article.
Any private sector employee would go on strike, quit their job and so on and so on.
Targeted strikes conform to the principle of proportionality—the notion that the anticipated collateral damage of an action cannot be excessive in relation to the anticipated military advantage. By targeting an individual terrorist or small numbers of terrorists with ordnance that can be adapted to avoid harming others in the immediate vicinity, it is hard to imagine a tool that can better minimize the risk to civilians than remotely piloted aircraft.
I will always make time for personal stitching. Whether it is stitching a cyber-class project or one of the many kitted charts I fell in love with while taking a break and surfing the Internet, every one of them teaches you something new. Because I am self-taught, ironing out the bad habits by reading and taking online classes helps a vast amount. We never stop learning.
(maybe 2 minutes later..If that)
French’s Save $.75/1 French Fried Onions (6/15)
And as I face the circumstances, transform me
2) Documentary/Dramas are Scary, Too!
We're really excited because it's been a few weeks because of the holidays. Stores didn't have much in the way of sales, so that was kind of a bust. That's one of the things about living in a small town. But, hey, if that's all there is to complain about, boy - we're doing pretty darn good! (Doing pretty darn good anyway you look at it! he he he!)
Traci Huskamp Being out in nature, listening to music, reading books and magazines always gets the wheels turning in this brain of mine.
3. One day, I hope to write a book about my experience of cyberloss.
We received this wonderful gift today in the mail and it brought tears to our eyes.....
Potassium 169.7 mg
Years ago from the blog Overcoming Bias I got the idea of near and far thinking including the idea that our opinions about particular issues can be very different from the choices we make. My own example was that coming from my particular religious background, I opposed a woman’s right to choose abortion, and would tell people so, until one asked for help in finding an abortion clinic. Then I sought to help her get what she wanted. Ones opinions of the world in general can be very different from ones choices, faced with an actual dilemma.
It is clear to me that I have a literary crush on John Green, meaning that I am so infatuated with his writing that it has become a part of my thinking, my world in the last several weeks. It’s been a long time since I felt this way about an author, and it’s been a treasure to experience it again. More than that, it’s given me inspiration for my own writing, something I needed so much, something that I hope will push me to new depths as I make my way through my next project.
And I think more than a few of us threw up in our mouths a little when we saw this and heard what this clearly uninformed person had to say about copyright.
oh, the embarrassment of having to ask for some money for food
I did say to the group that I thought that Freddie's realisation of his own failure seemed to me to come about rather suddenly, without any prior development, and the others nodded, Doug in particular agreeing that it was clunky. I said too that I had some fundamental problems with the arcane diction: not only did it seem out of character - why would a mathematician use such language? His justification, that he uses a dictionary, doesn't seem adequate - also it is too similar to the diction of the narrator of Banville's The Sea which we read previously, and one begins to suspect that it's Banville's diction rather than Freddie's. As a result, although in many ways I found the novel clever, I didn't sense enough separation between narrator and author to make me feel comfortably secure in an author's controlling hands, and, although Trevor had said how much he enjoyed the book, he strongly agreed.
The day before Independence Day is Yom ha-Zikaron (יום הזיכרון) - Israel's day of remembrance for those who died in wars or terrorist attacks. It's a very somber day, in what felt like a more personal way than Yom ha-Shoah, which happened the previous week on Thursday. Beginning a few days beforehand, Israeli radio and television stations started to broadcast stories about fallen soldiers and those who died in terrorist attacks. On the day itself, that is all that was broadcast. I usually listen to Reshet Bet, which is the news station of Israel Radio (something like NPR in the US but more closely tied to the government), and from Tuesday afternoon onwards and throughout Wednesday they broadcast a series of stories about individuals and groups who had died, and interviewed survivors of various battles from the War of Independence onward, as well as families who had a relative who had died in battle or in a terrorist attack, and survivors of terrorist attacks. Sometimes I had to turn off the radio because it was simply too sad.
"It's beginning to look a lot like Christmas
We are all very excited! I'll post more info as we get it, and of course, coming soon will be ultrasound pictures! Yippee!!!
It was an eye-opening and very sad visit. The country I remembered, the country where I spent some of the happiest days of my life, and the one so many took for granted, was gone. And I was hardly the only one who felt this way.
2 1/3 cup of flour
The new issue was released yesterday and it was such a thrill to see the article in it's entirety. Rachel McGinn is a fabulous photographer too...
I've been struggling a lot lately with remembering the purpose of my art. I think that doubt is incredibly simple. I know everyone doubts--I think its in our very nature as humans. The thing is, when you doubt your artistic vision, then its easy to forget your very purpose. And that's how I've felt the last couple of weeks--without a purpose. But I feel like I'm coming out of that now.
Ours boasts of it quite openly,
Holy day, holy burn
Two medical students were walking along the street when they saw an old man walking with his legs spread apart. He was stiff-legged and walking slowly. One student said to his friend: “I’m sure that poor old man has Peltry Syndrome. Those people walk just like that.” The other student says: ”No, I don’t think so. The old man surely has Zovitzki Syndrome. He walks slowly and his legs are apart, just as we learned in class.”
Well, it’s time to rock it out!!! I have some exciting news…. a new Ashley Martens Photography is coming!!! A complete overhaul… branding, website, packaging, blog make over, and more!!!! Keep checking back, I can’t wait to show you where my business is going!
We are not exactly sure when or how our bags were located, but on Sunday morning I received a call from Lily. She said that she had an email from Helen that said our bags had been sent. They should be in the states soon! A few minutes later another call said that she had misread her email and that the bags were already in the US! She told me that I should call United and see if they were tracking them for us. Before I had a chance to call United, Brian got a voicemail saying that they were in Milwaukee and were being delivered to us. That afternoon while I was putting Lydia down for her nap, all three bags arrived at our door.
Our dreams are like the rest areas on a cross-country trip. They refresh us, help us to gauge the distance we’ve come, and give us a chance to consider our destination.
Unfortunately, this emphasis on service can sometimes act as a double edged sword. Some people, both outside the church and within it believe that the church uses these programs as a way to help its members "earn" their way into heaven. Such is not the case. However, it's easy to see how one might get that impression.
In my dream booking, The Rock wins, he is standing on the 2nd turnbuckle, arm held high when the bell tolls. The same scenario would work for a Cena victory as well albeit not as effectively in my opinion. The lights in the arena go out and a big graphic of 21-0? shows on the screen. The show fades with The Rock and Cena looking back-and-forth to one another confused about who the message is for. This sets up next year’s WrestleMania Main Event – The Undertaker vs The Rock! Neither of these guys are full-time performers and it would make perfect sense in the grand scheme of things. Chance of it happening – 2%!!!
I can't remember if there is any preschool playground equipment available, but there is a small playground in the kids room. However, hotel guests have to pay for entrance. How weird. This is the first time I pay for kids play room at a resort as most of the resorts will let kids play for free, unless you require extra babysitting service.
Before I Post I want to dedicate this post in memory of Davy Jones (Monkees) Dec.30, 1945-Feb.29, 2012
Giving so bravely all they'd to give.
“This is because some of the nation’s religious scholars – and we do not underestimate them, for they are good people… But due to a certain confusion, they had dissenting views on the martyrdom operations, and this caused us great embarrassment. However, in his unequivocal fatwa, the sheikh, may Allah reward him, considered martyrdom operations to be the most noble level of jihad. That was unparalleled support for the people of Palestine, because, brothers and sisters, you cannot imagine how difficult it is psychologically for a young Palestinian man or woman to sacrifice themselves or what is most dear to them, only to encounter a conflict in their minds and hearts as to whether they are on the path of righteousness, or whether they are committing a religious violation.”
He lives to calm my troubled heart.
What makes it so special? I think we are special for a few reasons- one being our motivating and non judgmental environment. We have clients of all ages and fitness levels and we are sure to make each person feel “at home” when they walk into the studio. Also all the barre n9ne® instructors legitimately care about our clients; we are interested in getting to know them. We don’t just teach and class and say we’ll see you next week. We feel that knowing our clients allows us to make their workouts more effective. Some of these women spend, 5, 6, 7 hours with us a week. Why wouldn’t you want to get to know them? Lastly, many clients say that they are so happy to be part of the barre n9ne® family- and that is just it- it IS like a little family here. So many friendships have developed in the past 2 years and I can’t wait to see what the next two years brings.
Hi everyone. I'm home from my first speaking engagement with a
And send it back in time to myself at 17
Sadly, these are only monetary values. In order to go back to our couscous analogy, we need to take out the effect of inflation, that is, the increase in the price of meat, sesame, vegetables and services around providing the plate of couscous. When these are eliminated, the actual share, even by physical measures, have decreased.
The Twitter hashtag for the party is #CatchFire
how much more care for us? how much more flight can we take? with His breath under our wings we fly and sing our sparrow song.
Click the "Click here to Enter" link above for the entry form. Please type your name or screen name in the Caption or Title field, then choose the link and photo you'd like to enter. Please link directly to your specific blog post with your card in it, and not your general blog url.
Richard Grenell 45, a senior republican foreign policy expert was only hired two weeks ago by the Romney campaign but under pressure from anti-gay conservative groups he has resigned.
*) Establish panels, councils, or advisory boards uniquely for Muslims.
My waist was too fat,
Then he proclaimed that God is good.
Windows 8 offers enhanced support for multiple monitors. In Windows 8 it will be very easy to switch between multiple monitors. The primary monitor will be having a Start button where as the secondary monitor will be having a switch button.
18. And Suddenly
and smirked to himself.
Here’s what you need…
But as for the cynical marketing of the yoga lifestyle? I’m going to go right ahead and judge, sweetheart. Yoga is not about display and accessories and money. At least it shouldn’t be. And while I’m describing the world as I think it should be, I hope there’s yoga happening at the Bud Clark Commons. Every single day.
Well it has certainly been a long couple of weeks. As you will be aware I have been making a shed load of lampshades, which has gone quite well, but it has been at the expense of the housework, so our lovely home has been a bit of a pit! We have spent ALL DAY cleaning and tidying and DIY-ing and have only managed to do half the house so far. Hopefully we will get it all finished tomorrow, although the rooms for tomorrow include dining room (covered in lampshade making paraphernalia and debris) and the office (piles of paperwork and assorted rubbish from two people working from home!).
To hell with the movie stars, the pop stars and the politicians! The real stars are the people who get you through the reality of the day! Your family, your friends? Even your friendly local bar person! And nature and all it's unpredictability is pretty cool to!
However, this is where your experience, and mine differ. If I had to do it again, I would change nothing. And here is why:
Speaking to queries from the media, she explained that the photos are not meant for public viewing and she was shocked when a friend chanced upon them online and tipped her off.
Last night Sam did the impossible: he threw up...twice. It's not entirely accurate to say that it's impossible; improbable is more accurate. You see, as a result of his Nissen fundiplication, he should not be able to throw up. That means that there was a lot of pressure in his tummy forcing out formula. Basically, we think that Sam has limited gastrointestinal motility as a result of the anesthesia used in his procedure. In real words, that means he can't poop just yet. His gut needs to "reawaken." So...we had some moments of drama before realizing that we can't feed him quite as aggressively as we normally do. For a while, I thought that might keep us in hospital an extra day or two, but that leads me to the good news...
ago
She says, looking down at the warm sweets in her hands.
They come and go, merry they go
Rodriguez retired from the CIA in January 2008. His book is published by Simon & Shuster, an affiliate of CBS. Rodriguez talked about the pointy end of the sphere. McCain: it's killing us that America is stooping to the level of our worst enemies.
The DCTeacherTown Hall– hosted by WAMU’s Matt McCleskey – is designed to stir up conversation about education and the realities faced by local teachers.
Be persuaded that you can never better atone, and satisfy for your sins, than by offering Christ and his Sacred Merits (which you possess in communion) both to his eternal Father, and to himself. ‘Tis likewise the most efficacious means to preserve you from falling into sin. Therefore, whenever you offer up the Sacrifice of Holy Mass for your sins, fail not to communicate at least spiritually.
Speculation is rife that Shafee has been tasked with covering Najib’s tracks but others say that he has a more sinister role, like arranging a deal with the French court.
Now you want to tape, and wrap it around the tip. This will prevent the bag from opening while you’re squeezing it. So there’s your pastry cone.
Today, Mulcahy is an angry and frustrated man. He believes his life is in danger, a belief shared by Federal officials, and he is deeply disturbed by what he regards as a monumental lack of resolve, competence and communication within the Federal Government in handling the case. It took nearly four years to indict Wilson and Terpil in Washington, on charges that include illegal export of explosives, failing to register as a foreign agent, and conspiracy and solicitation to commit murder. Despite fugitive warrants, the Government has been unable to apprehend them at a time when their travels in and about Europe, the Middle East, Africa and the United States have been observed by many people. Last winter, more than six months after his indictment, Wilson was seen by a business friend in Blackie’s House of Beef, a Washington restaurant, with a group of his former employees; it is not known how he entered the country. Mulcahy, meanwhile, has been forced to lead a life of furtiveness. ”I’ve had five years of indecision, contradiction and waiting for the day that this chapter of my life ends,” he says. ”The Government keeps telling me, ‘We’re on top of it; we’re on top of it.’ ” Yet Wilson and Terpil remain at large, and many of their operations, which clearly seem to be working against the interests of their own country and, indeed, world peace, are believed to be continuing at this moment.
* Once I included a movie in a list, it was disqualified from other lists.
“Well that’s the cause of the gas. We have talked about this before Mrs. Archer. A little bit is okay, but a lot of cheese can give him indigestion and cause gas.
I didn’t say a word but I was giving silent high fives to Sahana. She can be a very positive influence on her brother. Once, I heard Ryan singing this song in his loud clear voice
I'm not sure if that's just booze talk behind her wandering eyes?
- Cosmetic Bag ($8.99) Great for keeping in the purse for on-the-go touch ups. (It's the one I have)
Well, birthday parties. I don't know how comfortable they'd be at a rager. Or a bachelor party.
Announcer: Penta-kill!
One of the key issues to be addressed is the Macedonian Encyclopedia. Albanians dispute the book because it says they are newcomers to the Balkans and not native to Macedonia.
This is the usual routine for nights like these. She helps take his mind off the previous events. Usually she starts with a cheesy joke to break the ever growing silence as he drives. Then goes on to talk about something, anything, but the fight. Eventually he loosens up and they talk for hours, parked in some random parking lot, the local park, or anywhere but home. They tell of past days as kids, present times in school or with other friends, and dream about the future. In the talking and joking and laughing the fighting is put to the back of both their minds and they head back. Arriving home when all the lights are out, not a sound is heard, and everyone is deep in sleep. They part their ways with a simple “goodnight” and “see you tomorrow” just like always.
